After the Hunger Games I looked for alternatives and found here. Now it's the second part. I can only recommend it.
Very good!
An interesting book
I love it.  This is good!
Grisham is a good, experienced and fluid writer. His heroes or protagonists are usually not supermen, but ordinary people - who are always a little smarter than their usually more powerful opponents. They fight with their heads instead of fists or a wrought iron. Grisham can also create tension without brutality, technical miracles or esoteric kittens. He also doesn't need to enrich his books with explicit sex scenes.
I liked good, written in typical Mary Barlogh manner. Unfortunately, all the stories are very, very similar. Nevertheless, I liked it, I also read it in the run-up to Christmas.
Anytime again.
The book is not bad for someone who still needs a lot of help reading and can check the English translation if there are problems. The stories are entertaining. The language is a bit old-fashioned, but the differences to modern feutsch are not so great that this would be a serious problem.
As has been described several times in the other reviews, the texts are quite demanding, albeit of high quality.
He is such a wonderful-wonderful storyteller, the Mr King, that I would like to thank him personally for this wonderful story. JOYLAND is a bit like the novella "The Corpse", from the season series (spring, summer, autumn and death) and a little reminiscent of THE GREEN MILE, under the title STAND BY ME.
This book provides an all-encompassing overview of the .Net Framework. It has references to the most important framework classes of each topic. In the end, you have a sound knowledge of the many areas covered by the framework.
Beautiful. In one copy, however, the box was glued so that it could not be opened without destroying the box.
The Lion King is a special film, a masterpiece.
Nakayama's books are really good textbooks. And I say that, even though I can't stand the man. His karate was bad and had little to do with the actual Uchinadi, with the teaching of Funakoshi.
The best restoration book I know. Unfortunately, the pictures are not of the best quality and some things are not correct, but where can you find more information about old Harleys?
As I imagined it to be. Good book.
This work enriches every martial arts library. At least that's how it should be. Sun Lutang is one of the greats of the Chinese Wushu, which is confirmed by this work. However, the book is by no means intended for beginners, if only because it does not have a good picture material. But that is my only criticism.
This book was written by a British man who taught a French stock system in India (after Pierre Vigny). That alone makes it a special work. In addition, it is also a useful book, as the techniques are simple and comprehensible. As is so often the case, there is a lack of images that cloud the enjoyment a little. Therefore only four stars.
This work by Lindholm and Svard is clearly one of the better works of this genre. In reconstructions of the teachings of old fencing masters, there is, of course, some room for interpretation. Most of the works I have seen about this use this space in a more imaginative rather than meaningful way. This also applies to most "big names in this genre. When judging these books, one should never lose sight of reality. After that, many of the interpretations are completely forbidden.
Good book with the most important beginner information...
I find the book quite good as a supplement to the specialist literature on the Uchinadi and its origins. This will give you a better idea of the circumstances at the time. Okinawa was conquered and the Uchinadi was created. So, very simple. But through this little Osprey work with its excellent pictures you can really put yourself into this time quite well. Together with the work of G.H.Kerr, this book is one of the treasures of this subject."
I do not want to blame the book for having to deal with such an extensive subject with so little space. But actually the triple page number would still be too little to accommodate everything that would be worth saying. Fortunately, Osprey puts quality above quantity, so four stars are justified.
Great romance and friendship - beautiful fairy tale.
I love the work of Thibault. It is a pleasure to read in this book, if only because it is one of the clearest fencing manuscripts there is.
The book contains many usable, everyday packaging that can be easily adapted to your own needs.
Slanted and unconventional, sometimes very funny to read. Reminiscent of Rosendorfer. Is something else.....
Funny yet so close to reality.
Unfortunately a very fast conclusion, but otherwise very good to read!
A great read that lets me walk through the forest with open and wide eyes. The combination of the scientific and historical side, as well as the potential emotional world of trees, has been successful.
Very funny and entertaining, no food for the soul, but nice pastime.
Funny entertainment reading.
Rarely have I been so amused when I read a book. Here, on the one hand, an unlikely crime story is told in a very humorous, exciting and with a lot of charity, on the other hand, in parallel, the extremely eventful life story of the centenarian, which leads us (with a wink) from one focal point of world history to the other. The reader meets, among other things, albert Einstein's hitherto unknown brother, learns the real reasons why America was able to make the atomic bomb first, why Russia only got the bomb later, and why Sweden still has none. All written in a language far removed from the literary elite - but also rising far above the well-polished and oiled tension prose of most of today's best-selling authors.
Those who are able to grant political key data a different origin story than well-informed circles" would like to believe, is well served with this Swedish Forest Gump. Bad weather, a cozy corner and a good drop - then the apolitical serenity of the hero has a direct effect on the reader and he can easily and gladly also become a cheerful 100! Have fun!"
Quite great at the beginning, historically a bit coarse towards the end - a pity!
Very interesting!
My first ebook I read on my new Kindle Fire HD.  Exciting, easy-to-read story. I've always wanted to read.
Only to be recommended.
Was interesting to read. The cracking of messages encrypted by the Germans with Enigma by the English may have played out in a similar way. I would only have liked more technical information on Enigma.
The book was in good condition, as was written in advertising. I am satisfied.
How much more interesting and, above all, more instructive would a history lesson with material in the style of this book have been?
I have read Baldick's work on the duel several times in a row. That certainly speaks for this book. But since I have also read some duel books from the 18th and 19th centuries, I can say that there are some weaknesses in the detail. That's why a star stays with me.
I am a great friend of Mr Draeger. His books were pioneers in their time, but they are still absolutely worth reading today. Only the details are often kept a little too frugal. There are now works that delve deeper into matter and yet are not overloaded.
The only criticism I have for this issue is that this issue does not really fit on so few pages. Otherwise, everything is in the usual Osprey-Qualitt. Text and images are good and the price is reasonable.
As with some Osprey issues, there is no room for such an exciting and extensive topic. The texts are good and the drawings are the first choice, but too much is lost, mainly in the representation of the Arab army. I always felt that the next page would go into more detail. But that didn't happen. That is why I reserve a star.
Very fast shipping, goods in order, shipping costs totally in the green area, everything perfectly run, gladly done again.
This book by J.I. Wong is a good work. It is not quite up to date and a new edition would really be necessary, but this fact should not affect my assessment. A star stays with me because some passages are inaccurate or - to my knowledge - incorrect.
The work "Sowing the Dragon's Teeth: Byzantine Warfare in the Tenth Century (Dumbarton Oaks Studies)" contains the only English translation of the Precepta Militaria available to date. Due to its importance for The Byzantine military history, this edition is therefore an absolute must for every Byzantium fan.
The book shows beautiful shots, and gives a good overview of the canyons and their inhabitants. The description is sufficient and informative. The texts are written in English and Spanish. Unfortunately, you miss a lot in the translation from Spanish.
This book gets four stars from me because it basically contains everything it promises. There is little literature about the "Glima". Any exception is therefore welcome. I reserve a star because the quality could be a little better.
A children's book, not bad.
A nice story, which was very well implemented by the book set in this version. It's fun to follow the story.
I really enjoyed reading Silver.
This story is nice. I grew up with this story. I really enjoyed reading them again.
There is little to say. This work is not bad. If you know what to expect, you will not be disappointed with this book. In addition, there is virtually no literature about Burmese boxing. The price could be a bit lower and the pictures a little better. But I don't keep more than one star for that.
Evaluating a book is always associated with the possibility of being misunderstood. This edition of Sainct Didier's fencing book is a good example. The price is justified and the presentation is good. As far as technical standards are concerned, I don't always follow Hyatt and Wilson. 
Easy to learn.
The book is a good work with small weaknesses, mainly due to meager source material. When you write about an epoch that dates back a few hundred years, there will always be room for interpretation.
It's a thin book with good advice. It was sent in a reasonable time. I am satisfied with the delivery and the service.
The book reads well - even from one who can only speak school English. If you are interested in learning about German immigrants to the USA, you will be offered a lot of information.
Overall, I like the book pretty much. The footage could have been a little better. Everything else has already been noted by the other critics.
A very successful work, again and again with exciting twists and many insights into medieval everyday life. And a lot of background knowledge about the historical contexts of the time.
Easy and easy to read. The narrator speaks slightly Bavarian, but all High German readers should understand this well. Will buy me more books by the author.
A fun and entertaining book for the cold and dark days to come. The peculiarities of the southern Germans are described in a particularly ulkig way.
Wonderful hours! When will the sequel come? This family, this village gives everyone a smile, a laugh until the tears come or at least a grin. Magnificent atmosphere that you can find everywhere, but which put the situations in the right light: with humour it goes right again.
Excellent but unfortunately too long. The editor and the publisher were probably so pleased with the author's new novel that every word was too precious to shorten. I could have avoided the umpteenth rush of drugs and alcohol. Everything else: great.
The story about Roland, Eddie and Susannah is still extremely exciting. Especially the beginning and the end pack you extremely.
Metro has long made history. Finally I read it. I like it very much.
The book is very good!
Death on the Way of St. James is a good book. Easily written, wonderful character studies and the description of the Way of St. James could also be used to prepare for travel.
I know Nele Neuhaus only from her Tanus-Crimes, where I especially snow white must die very much. Now the author shows that she can also implement other plots excitingly and skilfully. If you don't want to put it out of your hand until you know how it's going to end...
A funny book about an interesting subject. Light reading.
Hadn't read anything from Schnitzler for a long time - and forgot what an entertaining narrator he is. Recommended to all who want to dive back into the past ...
Captivating fantastic journey through the districts of Panem. Pictured, sometimes somewhat martial and bloody, Katniss walks her way in search of the right thing and her peace of mind!
A cool book. This was the first novel I've ever read on German. Very nicely written and interesting to read.
The book was good, but there is no clear plot.  Hector, who is a psychologist, always writes down his thoughts about time and connects this with his own life. His thoughts of the time also play a role in his relationship with his girlfriend, who is slowly worried that she will grow old. By and large, it's a nice story, but twice it wouldn't be worth it.
I read the book many years ago. It is amusing and entertaining, describing how a little boy sees the war and its consequences.
I really liked this humorous thriller.
The third part of a great trilogy. All three are recommended. I liked the first two better, but this book was a good conclusion to this family saga.
Funny, full of humour and lifelike anecdotes, but a little "simple".
Although I already knew many of these topics, e.g. from the book "The Story of Stuff" the book grabbed me and convinced me and opened up some new aspects for me. The author manages to show almost repetition-free the whole range of problems and causes in your networking and especially the role that large companies have in it. Only the instructions for action seem to me to be very tame and standard compared to the problems and not appropriate. "Live your dreams and have fun" can be appropriate and achievable for our society - yet - but for the people in the exploited countries this is cynical advice.
Master Mattson's book was a really good textbook for his time. Even today you can benefit from it, not only those who dedicate themselves to karate, especially the Uechi Ryu, but actually all martial artists. It has gotten a bit old and would have needed a revision. But that is actually secondary.
The book was exciting and I devoured it. The change between the present and the past was something else.
Quite entertaining crime story, just a little too short.
Psychologically well developed, exciting and also sensitive depth.
I have already ordered the next one, reads very well in my opinion, there are still some books by the author.
This book is incredibly worth reading.
I first read this book when I was a kid. The style in which it is written is a little unusual for today, but I still liked to read it again. A book for older children and for adults who remain children, too.
Years ago my first book by Brown - borrowed - and now after a few years read again as an eBook - a lot of excitement until the end!
A realistic and symbolic novella with superstitious files!
This beautifully illustrated book describes a sweet story that captivates children.
Exciting family story with a historical background. Good character description.
An amazing story. Especially interesting if you know the author in her later professional life.
My daughter liked this book. Nice drawings, good history, in short, a good find.  Not world literature... but you can read it a few times.
Inspiring and well written.
I really liked it. Great story!
The book has so many interesting stories from the post-war period!
Written with great thoroughness, fascinating document.
Highly intelligent plans, intrigues, conspiracies and ingenious chess moves - brilliant!
I'm excited about the book. Is very rich in information. Here you will really learn a lot about Windows 8. I can only recommend.
The book contains the therapy concept of "working with the inner child". In my opinion, the author has succeeded very well in explaining an extremely complex subject in an easy-to-understand and illustrative way. It is a self-help book, written for everyone, without psychological background knowledge, not for a professional audience. A book that I think can be read and can lead to important personal insights and promotes self-reflection with practical examples and many exercises.
The CD is of course very good in terms of content. One notices, however, that the original lecture is a live recording. But for the price it is ok and in my mind it is also about the content of the lecture by Anja Stahl. Therefore not quite 5*stars.
The book is helpful to find yourself. A great help of self-reflection or to be able to better assess other people. However, it is a difficult read, which you have to get involved in in order to understand it.
Lots of helpful food for thought. For me, however, there is a little too much talk about the "inner child", that is, that many of the problems that one has today have their origin in childhood and how one can address the inner child of that time in order to solve his problems. In my opinion, it is difficult to implement. Otherwise helpful!
Beautiful book to relax. Well told and written. Ideal for holidays or evenings after work and in bed.
The book was given away. On request: Is interesting and helpful!
This book is beautifully written and easy to understand. Also the included tips and tricks are very helpful.
I don't like everything but most of it. 
Hits it very accurately and is very interesting.
I liked the book very much. I could better understand why things happened or happened in my life and the exercises and the way to take on Shadow Child helps me deal with it constructively now.
Very interesting book. It is good and understandable to read. Encourages people to think about themselves and others. It helps a lot to better understand others.
A good book to rework.
This book is well-understood and I find the subject really interesting. Pulls down to the end. To work on himself and understand his behaviors, I thought it was really good.
I just flew over everything and read the passages that seemed important to me. In many you can recognize yourself.
If you have read...
Not easy to read, but super interesting book!
Well.
Helpful reading.
Highly recommended to read in tell.
The book reads very well.
Very well written.
I bought the book on recommendation and am satisfied. I also like the 2 big drawings. I can recommend the book further. 
I gave this book to a loved one. It has arrived very well with her and she can recommend it.
Very close to everyday life and easy to understand, helpful for many crises in life.
I think this book is well done, it served as a guide for me, but therapeutic help is still needed. Recommended.
It was a gift for a friend. She wanted this book for her birthday. She found it very informative and satisfied.
This book helps to distinguish a link between hurt feelings from childhood and current feelings as an adult and how to break the patterns. The book is written very well and understandably, has many examples and exercises. I would buy it again.
For people who strive for personality development absolutely worth reading and and see known. The book confirms in many things, even if you have been working with you for a little longer. Maybe not one of my favorite books, but definitely one that shouldn't be missing.
A beautiful book for in between that invites you to think. However, one should not expect too much, it is read quite quickly and rather scratches on the surface. Nevertheless, precisely because of the metaphors and stories in the book worth reading in between.
Short u crisp story that offpotherss thinking. About himself u his life. All in all, an interesting reading, which is of course read quite quickly, because it is also well written.
Very inspiring book. I was recommended and I am very grateful for this tip. If you're at a point where you need a different angle or wonder why they're doing it all - read this book!
If you want to go on the journey to a personal development, you will find exciting approaches here. However, these are not "rocket science" either - but they summarize suggestions vividly and well to read.
It provides an interesting view of the attitude to life that is often not considered in our short-connected society. The book is relaxed to read in a short time and stimulates reflection on one's own attitude to life.
Nice holiday reading, but nothing new or what the normal person shouldn't already know anyway. Sometimes a little swagger, long-winded. Still easy to read and a slightly different read.
Interesting book that stimulates food for thought. In the course of the story, however, one gets the feeling that the operators of the café are omniscient and a 180° turn in life is so easy to realize.
Loose and easy reading, the meaning of the book is also really good and stimulates reflection. But if you are looking for something with concrete approaches, you are misread here.
Very interesting book that makes you think. The questions that are transmitted can each reader relate individually to his life. Would I always recommend!
Good condition. Was not disappointed by the content.
Excellent. Fast delivery. Very satisfied.
Can be read well in one go. Recommended for one or the other workaholic.
Great book for people who want to find themselves. It asks some elementary questions about life and everyone should answer them for themselves.
I liked it. It is an entertaining booklet and gives some thought suggestions. The questions about the meaning of life wrapped in a story.
Nice book to think once a slightly different book idea on this subject. Easy to read was through in 2 hours.
Very entertaining and invites you to think. Ideal for short breaks and first exercises.
A wonderful story. Simple but still inspiring. Very nice.
The book offers a lot of scope for interpretation and is therefore suitable for everyone.
All great. Delivered within the scheduled time.
Everything as it should.
Reads very entertaining. Helps to see things in life from a different perspective. Is to be used as a building block in personality development. Highly recommended.
Great story. I don't know yet what I'm going to "draw" from it, but it's just the impulse to think about these 3 questions that makes this book worth reading.
I loved reading it and giving it away. Nice souvenir.
Worth reading.
Very easy to read, nice for in between, for people who also have an understanding of a different view otherwise pointless.
A friend's recommendation. Very interesting, old, "new" and other wisdoms are described and recommended to one very vividly.
An ideal booklet for reflecting on one's own life.
Fast delivery and great book!
Very nicely told and comprehensible. Moving and inspiring. The café could be anywhere in the world. The story makes you think.
At first a bit tough, but gradually easier to read and then it touches even deeper. Important insights for young and older life!
Very inspiring, stimulates reflection, still preoccupies you in hindsight, changes the way of thinking in a lasting way, thoughts about the meaning of life.
The book is super written, you can identify with the main character, it is a book that makes you think and what you can read over and over again.
Beautiful book, easy to read, I'm not quite through yet.
Why am I here? This has occupied me since the beginning of the book. I can recommend the book further. Have fun.
I found the book very interesting. The dialogue was a bit confusing for me to read, but would still recommend it.
I really liked the book, it really makes you think, I can definitely recommend it.
A successful book. It encourages reflection. I'll certainly read it a second time.
This book definitely encourages you to think and makes you ponder the "purpose of his existence".
Was read out within a short time, no literary feat but otherwise quite nice.
Light reading material that makes you think.
A good and easy to read book. All in all nothing new, but very well suited to make yourself think again.
Everything was right. Delivery time ok.
Well written.
Stimulates reflection. Well written, very entertaining.
A beautiful little story that makes you think.
A beautiful story that makes you think.
A wonderful story that you can always take to your hand.
All good.
Good book.
Easy to read and kind of makes everyone think... not a great book, nothing groundbreaking new but for people who are just starting to think about themselves and the world....
Really beautiful story, very profound but packaged in such a way that it is easy for everyone to understand. For me, unfortunately, only the language style was a little too simple, too banal - could have been a little more poetic, that would have made the whole thing a bit more aesthetic. On the whole, however, it is worth reading in every respect!
The book is very interestingly written. Sometimes when you read, you think, "Do you think, why am I not icing this now?". However, there is a star deduction because many things are repeated very often, which has annoyed me a little bit personally. But in and of itself it is a beautiful book where often stimulates reflection.
Great profound book, especially in this day and age, when the day can have more than 24 hours to work more. There is a star deduction because of the stealth advertising of the organization of the author.
The book is easy to read and encourages reflection. What more do you want? Clear recommendation from me for all those who are looking for new ways.
Very nicely written. The book makes you think a little bit. But has no profound wisdom of life that I wasn't looking for when I bought the book. Can be read beautifully in one piece.
Very beautifully written history, however, the book is very short. That's why you're done with it in about 2-3 hours.
I really expected more on recommendations. However, it was not necessarily bad and stimulates reflection in some places. Even some quotes were not bad and can be associated with your life.
The book is simply written. In this way, however, one does not lose oneself in a story, but is encouraged to think about oneself and one's path.
History stimulates reflection on the meaning of life by means of examples...... in principle nothing new...... but nice to read....
A beautiful story about doing what you love. You can read it within a week. Recommended.
Fascinating book that lets you put you in this café and you just have to read it through in one... You get completely different perspectives on life in the world.
For someone who is moved by the theme of "sense of life," reading this story could be a nice addition. Well suited as a gift, when it is known that the recipient deals with the meaning of life.
The book reads well and the process of reflection gradually begins. Think about it a lot now.
The book reads easily and quickly. Super book to read in nature or on the beach. Inspires to think.
A very entertaining novel that encourages you to think again about the important questions of life. The questions asked in the novel can be very revealing for every person at the right time.
Super nice to listen to as an audiobook. Quite light food and you can transfer the stories very well into everyday life and find yourself in different situations. I disagree on some things, but that is perfectly fine.
The American bestselling author John Strelecky knows how to captivate the reader with his fictional story to every page, every moment of the book. The 128 pages are quickly read, but burn into the reader's memory...
I love these books! Can hardly put it out of your hand! Very nice and interesting written!
I bought this book spontaneously today to relax a bit. The plan worked. I read the book with interruptions in one day. I thought it was great to think again about whether everything in life is going the way you want it to be. And that everyone of his luck is Schmid.
Good book.
Basics for a happy life.
Great book, quick to read. Even though I have been working on the subject for a while, it makes me think. The questions are very general. In itself, nothing new has been for me.
I bought the book for your own use and notice that various passages refer to your own life and actions. I can only recommend it further.
Sometimes I had to read the passages a few times to understand how it is meant, but by and large a book that really made me think and develop...
Arrived today as expected, I'm looking forward to the contents of the book.
Sometimes some dry fabric but absolutely recommended if you like to deal with life.
Great book. Encourages reflection and rethinking. For me it was a bit exhausting to always read in dialogue. Hence a star deduction.
Informatively good.
The book is well written, and even - despite the dry theme - quite entertaining. But if you've already dealt with high-quality, plant-based diets, you won't get much new.
Great written book with great information about nutrition that I didn't know before. For this purpose, the information in the book is almost always supported by scientific research.
Good book! Can be read well with valuable tips.
Very good book, written in tell some way
Book is very informative and explains a lot about the connections between nutrition and health. The information is general.
The book is very interesting and informative. I pull off a star because the book often contains more complex words that probably not everyone will understand right away. Otherwise highly recommended!
I have found the arguments that contribute to a healthy lifestyle so convincing that I am more cautious in the choice of foods.
Easy to read, well-founded, factual. Not entirely free of personal preferences, but these are recognizable as such.
Good summary, but sometimes a little too dry and scientific.
Great book! Explains the diet.
Everything you need to know about nutrition! But not a textbook.
Readable and understandable. Sometimes it could be a little more crisp. At the end of the day, I want to be able to act.
Exciting to read and also to use and use for everyday life!
Described in great detail sometimes too long.
At first I thought the book wasn't for me, but luckily I didn't put it aside. It has brought me a profit and helped me to change my eating habits for the better, I hope.
Sounds great, well told. I think it's just the voice that's a little sleepy. But that's a matter of taste. Otherwise great.
The book was very insightful. I would have liked only a little more on the topics of salt and iodine than just a single sentence on the last page. There is a star deduction for this.
Makes you think a lot about what you read and listen to diets.
Soothingly unexcited text, well-founded and with the dozens of supporting documents listed in the appendix. So very different from the same guides. Reads well and is really helpful. Unfortunately not nice graphically, there could really have been more plugged in. It doesn't have to be funny thick and thin males/females, but unfortunately the book isnot really vivid.
The nutrition compass delivers on its promises. A signpost in the right direction. Very good and precise articles that can be very useful to you.
A book for people who are unable to put their own thoughts into certain contexts.
Very insightful and detailed, well explained.
The book is really great in content. The recipes are beautifully written and taste really great. Unfortunately, the quality of the book is not convincing. On mine, just one side wasn't cut off properly. I don't think that should be with a €20 cookbook.
The book is great, great written great recipes. Above all, you don't have to shop in the Reformhaus to eat healthily. I find it a pity that some pages are contaminated, dark lines like from the pencil. It's not serious but the book costs 20.-!
I like the book very much and it really stimulates a healthy diet with great recipes. However, they are not ingredients that you have in a standard kitchen. This makes the recipes quite expensive for me. But the recipes themselves are super tasty.
Great book with great recipes. Are just me personally a lot of sweet bowls. But find most super tasty and very easy to make. If you eat a vegan diet, you have the most ingredients at home.
The book is very beautifully made and the dishes are prepared with love. Tastes very good and very good to cook. That's right, you need a lot of ingredients Bin very satisfied with the cookbook.
A really great book. Unfortunately, it is more for sweet cats than for the tart tooth but by and large great. Also arrives well as a gift.
A really great book, beautiful recipes that also give you room to vary. I like portion sizes, as well as that they are never too sweet or salty. I personally would have liked a little more vegan recipes.
Very clearly written, good tips for shopping, storage and useful information about nutritional values, oils. nuts, etc. Recommended for beginners.
It all looks super nice in this book but unfortunately these dishes don't appeal to me at all. From the processing of this book I can only say that it is very nicely processed.
Delicious new recipe ideas without exotic ingredients. Can be adjusted seasonally. Nicely described with beautiful photos that make you want to recook.
Great book with theoretical content. I think if I bought the basic ingredients, then I can just recook most of the recipes. I'm excited!
A really great book with style. The recipes look great and taste good too. Partly expensive ingredients, but that's worth it.
Very good photo paper, fast delivery, always happy.
I think the recipe ideas are really great and can't wait to cook them. I would like to see more vegan recipes or alternatives to meat dishes as a tip.
Book arrived on time. Was a gift to my girlfriend who just loves fitness and was looking for good recipes. Recommended! Price, however, is a little too expensive.
It has been very gladly accepted as a gift.
Fancy ingredients but good recipes.
Super recipes and great elaboration of different foods. This provides an accurate overview of which foods have which advantages. I've tried a lot so far and my husband and I are thrilled. Personally, I find the many recordings of Pamela a little exaggerated. I usually like the layout very much.
Great book, you learn insanely interesting facts in every chapter and learn about the connections between (evolution) biology, history, psychology and politics.
The only criticism on my part: Harari makes a lot of effort to write loosely and generally understandable. Nevertheless, it is above all a non-fiction book, which also has one length or another. So I couldn't read too much about it. Nevertheless: clear purchase and reading recommendation.
The author tries to present the different approaches of possibilities of the development of mankind in an easy-to-understand way without going into any particular theory. Well researched and documented.
Simple yet interestingly written. At the next barbecue party you can boast with well-founded half-knowledge and inform yourself well beyond that for all other interests. Beautifully documented and researched. A recommendation!
I liked the book very much. However, it sometimes reads a little heavy.
The book is very worth reading and gives good insights into the history of mankind. In my view, the theses are well illuminated and supported by arguments. The middle part is a bit long-winded. For this reason, a star deduction.
Super book, mega interesting and also a great gift.
Sometimes the air is left out. A rousing world of thought with lots of exciting historical information. The journey of thought can begin.
A book that attempts to show the development and possible future of Homo Sapiens in various aspects. It conveys new views and insights on the subject of "human" and illustrates the "amorality" of genes!
An all-round era for the development of humanity. Some collective dinosaurs collected and also put together. Technically reasoned and fundamentally explained. In addition, in the documentary style, it is excitingly written and easy to read like a novel. I thought it was great.
Loose spelling, surprising comparisons, clear sentences, clear thoughts, although all not entirely new, but overall an informative, not too strenuous and strenuous reading.
It's a very long-winded book. But super interesting and packed with information. Understandable, very well structured and authentic. Good author. Very good.
A very good popular science book that makes you more inspired and wiser - highly recommended despite small lengths, especially in the final chapter.
Super entertaining book about the entire history of mankind. Certainly one can disagree on one or the other point, such as about the existence of the soul or medical DNA, but this does not diminish the unique summary in this book.
This book gives you a nice overview of the recent history of mankind. It is written in tell for everyone. However, the book really only gives an overview. If you want to find out more about certain events, you should use another book.
Interesting and entertainingly written. Some parts are subjectively written. Some things, such as that the Nazis are evolutionary humanists, are unfortunately historically wrong. Still four stars.
In this book, Dale Carnegie has succeeded in bringing new perspectives to the reader in an entertaining, comprehensible and above all very exemplary way. Many practical examples and amusing stories that encourage you to try them out. Even if the book and thus some of the examples are already outdated, still read able to read and recommend it.
There is no book to record. Anyway, I haven't found it yet.
This book is rich in methods and examples of how to take people for themselves and their thoughts without expecting a negative aftermath. Whoever uses what is read becomes a partner with whom one only wants to talk.
Is a great book for personal development. The stories are all quite old, but they are still up-to-date in terms of content.
A really good book. The title is a bit irritating, but you can take a lot out of the book. I can only recommend it.
It's really fun to read the book. In terms of content, it convinced me. However, some of the letters are printed a little pale, which is not so nice, but does not hinder the flow of reading.
Goods and delivery were ok, can be recommended at any time.
Can be read super and reveals a lot about the psychology of man.
Very good book tried some advice itself with success. But you should convince yourself of it. So it's not a mistake to buy it.
The book is great! I love it. So much content - EVERYONE can learn something from it.
Slightly more difficult to write than Go pro. Still, it's a great book where you learn a lot.
Interesting book, not very in-depth but with many nice tips and stories.
Very good book, I only got through at the first 2 chapters, but try to implement it for what has already brought a lot.
It's as if your grandpa is telling you wisdom. Simply beautiful. Sometimes hard to follow, but it's also a kind of education.
A nice book, it seems to me as if it's written only for business relationships, but the tips can be implemented excellently on a private level.
The book is easy to read, you can get some tips from it and try to put it into practice.
The book is a must for personality development. In the beginning it takes a little bit for the really interesting topics to come, but in the middle and in the end it is very good.
A very nice book with great tips. Some examples may be "old-fashioned," but that doesn't detract from the book's meaning. I like it very much.
A fantastic book, the author does not reinvent the wheel, but he makes us aware of many things again. The corresponding is rounded off by a variety of mini narratives. As we all know, it depends on the little things, for me a book, which I would like to read again at regular intervals.
Very interesting and you can also learn a lot, but you notice that the author lived a long time ago. At the same time, however, I also think that there were interesting insights into the time of 100 years ago.
Short introduction to the use of the Dutch Oven, nice collection of recipes. But besides the recipes themselves, there is a lack of explanatory texts.
Just good. New ideas for old grill masters and simple instructions for young newcomers. Something for every taste.
The book is beautifully designed with many pictures. Suitable for beginners. The recipes we've tried so far have been delicious!
There are many good ideas in it.
Very fast delivery. Good book and beautiful recipes.
Good recipe ideas for the dutch oven. Simply explained and also suitable for newcomers of the dutch oven s super for re-cooking. Schmöker always likes to get in there and change the recipes to your own taste.
Great, thank you and happy again.
Many interesting recipes and a very successful introduction to the topic Dutch Oven.
Great recipes, just delicious.
Good recipes, well described, simple ingredients well prepared.
The book is handy and has everything you need to know.
I particularly like the brevity of the chapters. No unnecessary bantinating. Likes also the selection of chapters, appeal to me very much and was positively surprised!
The book is quite nicely made, the tips ok, but didn't pull me along now. Hence a star deduction.
Easy to read and quite informative book on the situation in the world, which asks the questions of our time such as world health, income differences, development of countries in the last 50 years,... Answered. Exciting and worth reading, however, more background information on the topics covered would have made the book even better.
Great written and teaches you to see things a little more nuanced. In the future, I will try to apply things and pass them on to my children.
A very interesting and insightful reading. Highly recommended, even if sometimes formulated a little long-winded. Makes many things appear in a completely new but comprehensible light.
The booklets are great. We already had the first two and are satisfied. I deplet one point since Amazon did not deliver the next day, as announced, but 4 days later.
Hello together, we always the next day after ordering the booklets were there, the child has unpacked this directly and started learning, satisfied.
Perfect. Easy to understand.
Great to train for reading comprehension.
I was very impressed by the honesty in describing an attempt to live family in constant observation by the public. The author describes her inner struggle to live the person she really is and wants to be, while at the same time fulfilling the tasks that an FLOTUS has.
This book is very open and entertainingly written. It comes across very authentically, a strong and honest woman reports from her life, with ups and downs.
The book was intended as a gift for my wife. She read the book within a few days and was positively surprised. The book was well written and read easily and intelligibly.
It was a gift to my wife, who was very happy about it and is very interested in the content!
As a gift well received, only the page number surprised the recipient. Nevertheless, other interested parties have already registered to borrow.
The book is written very nicely. In the middle part a bit boring. By and large good and entertaining.
Flott written, in places a little too detailed. Overall worth reading.
Very informative and honest, a wonderful woman this Michelle Obama.
Looking good to read entertaining, society in the USA clearly represents. There is nothing to add to this, everyone can form their own opinion.
Great biography, but it seems a bit smooth ironed. Nevertheless, an absolute recommendation from me - even for people who are not interested in politics.
I have always been interested in the ability to build up a fortune with shares and thus generate passive income. This book explains in a clear and very understandable way how to build assets with shares and how to build up assets. The practical tips are very interesting. This book is great for beginners. I found it easy to understand and I will try to implement some of it.
To get a rough overview of the big world of stock trading, the book is definitely a good choice. However, one should not expect it to go into much detail here. For bloody beginners but definitely a good choice.
A clear guide for as completely inexperienced newcomers as we are or perhaps want to become. In order to get an overview of the stock exchange and investments etc. in the first place, you will find here well information about the basics.
The book has given me a very good introduction to the subject and offers a very good overview.
Did I see what was happening on the stock market. All in all, simply written and therefore easy to understand.
Highly recommended newcomers in stocks. Very good examples and wonderfully explained with simple choice of words. I can only warmly recommend. Thank you.
Personally, I was able to take some of the book with me. So it offered me the added value I was looking for on this subject.
The book is perfect for people who have never had anything to do with stocks. After that, you have a solid basic knowledge.
A good e-book with a precise step-by-step guide. Even I could understand a few things here, although I don't really see through this subject. I have found the right e-book for me. Would I also buy myself tied in. However, one point deduction, because I would have liked a little more scope.
If you haven't really dealt with the topic of equities, you'll be right to buy the book and you can get an insight into the world of stocks. Is very well written.
The recipes are perfect for professionals. I've tried some recipes and it hasn't taken long to prepare them. In addition, the recipes are really delicious. My only criticism is that there are no pictures of the courts. In my experience, this helps to decide more quickly for one of the courts.
The recipes are easy and quick to cook, the explanations are great. Some dishes are also available directly in several variants for every taste in this book.
Very good recipes - is fun to recook.
A super written book with very tasty recipes. These are not too complex and can be cooked well - ideal if you don't have too much time. Have tried a lot and Am very satisfied! Above all, I like the fact that everything tasted great, but is still really healthy. So low carb is fun!
Delicious and healthy recipes await beginners and laymen in the versatile recipe book. So you don't really have to give up something. The history of the low carb as well as the advantages are clearly described here for the reader. The procedure is described simply, everyone manages to do that.
Good book with great recipes. You can take the cooked things with you very well to work. The recipes are delicious and well written. Also find it great that the kcal details etc are listed per serving. You don't have to calculate that yourself.
In this book, a former model reveals her weight loss secrets. If you really want to lose weight quickly, you will get many useful tips here. You can find out which foods are unsuitable for losing weight and which really boost fat burning. Many diet forms are explained in detail so that everyone can find the right diet form for themselves.
Very informative book, which illuminates and explains a lot about the topic of "diets" and "slimming". Some things are known, others are new. In any case, when you read it, you get the feeling that you have done a good research and that you are consistent. And what I find particularly good is that it is written in a simple, generally understandable language. I like it.
Great book! If it had been 10 years ago, I would have saved myself many dietary errors. Only 4 stars, because there wasn't much new for me personally, but my experiences were confirmed.
Interesting book that is very well written. It is exciting with many different explained diets. It explains exactly which ones work and which do not. Good book.
I read it completely and I have to say that I liked it, except that you can't pronounce some names unless you read the name several times.
In my opinion, the book is well translated and fun to read, the content should have been read by everyone.
Very exciting insight into Asian warfare and its strategic foundations / considerations in good German understandably prepared. Good reading.
Find it a nice standard work, what you can read once and is quite exciting. However, the scope of the plant for corporate management and employee management is not revealed to me in this translation.
All great and a very great book, which lets you immerse yourself in the mindset of the old Chinese! Greetings and lots of fun reading.
Very amusing as always. The kangaroo is unbeatable for me, but still worth hearing. Had it through very quickly and would buy it again.
Nice book with lots of nice anecdotes about technical gadgets...
Good novel. Fascinating to what extent we are already inside.
Very exciting and terrifyingly realisticwritten. The fact that most technologies already exist today makes the book all the more exciting and present. 
A good and entertaining summary of the opportunities and, above all, the dangers of Internet transparency. Die-hard online experts will discover little new, but the critical view is certainly sharpened with the story. All in all recommended, especially for beginners on the topic of online transparency.
The Circle is an exciting book. It shows us what the world can look like if digital development continues in this way.
Super book I like to read. Exciting and the theme of close fiction well chosen... I am very satisfied. Thanks.
I have to say that the book is super written and also fits perfectly into the internet age!!! I'm still there, but I have to say it pleases.
I found the book extremely exciting, precisely because most of the things described there would be possible today. Can only recommend it. There is a star deduction because, as is so often the case, the end simply does not satisfy me.
Have discovered this new crime writer. Can recommend the book. But it could be longer. I love books that lead the reader in detours, e.g. Nele Neuhaus or Charlotte Link.
If you want to go on holiday on Amrum, you should pack up the crime thriller. Exciting, entertaining and lots of insider knowledge make it a recommendable holiday reading. In addition, there are also tips for staying on the island.
Very well written, captivating thriller. Makes fun to read from start to finish.
The story is very well written and exciting, even if it is a very serious subject, it is a successful story.
I think the thriller is quite good. It fits exactly to the island of Föhr. The end is unexpected.
I am pleasantly surprised, I like, therefore also bought part 2. Not far-fetched, but realistic and comprehensible.
Excitingly written with an authentic commissioner who, in addition to her professional ambition, also shows a loving personal side. Recommended for all crime lovers who don't need countless deaths.
I liked it very much. Was exciting until the end. Only the procurement of Internet data I find something suspect and certainly not permissible.
Super exciting, we different storylines. Expertly structured, pleasant to read. The right train reading. Don't forget to get out of the way with excitement. Well done.
An old theme but well packaged, I can recommend further. Real life is depicted around it, because even heroes have problems in family etc.
Theme and procedure great, until the very end I enjoyed the book. The many names are a bit confusing at the beginning. Very good.
I really liked the novel. A really exciting thriller. I am looking forward to the next case. I read the ebook.
I haven't read the novel to the end. I like him very much so far.
Another beautiful story from Sarah. As fairy tales are, some things are unrealistic and kitschy. Great story to switch off.
Great book series, read and be enthusiastic.
The book can be read down quickly by its fluid writing style. The story is light fare and for between by just the right thing.
You could read it well. History was predictable, but I wanted to read it to the end.
The book is very exciting and captivating.
The book is very simple, but according to the price good. Recommended for those who want to read the classic for themselves.
Very interesting book, recommended for someone who is interested in power or ancient politics. Partly quite old-fashioned, but still very original and nice to read.
Good book. State super.
It's been a long time since I read the books and to refresh everything, this article is really great. If you want to enjoy listening to the CD in the evening and enjoy it, this is a must for fans.
I can only refer to the judgment of the recipients. She is extremely satisfied with this issue. The text is the best compared to other issues.
The books arrived almost as good as described. The paperbacks had slight traces of storage, but were unread. Everything went well.
I am satisfied with the article. There were also no problems with the delivery time. I would buy the item again.
The classic in the best translation available for german!
Great radio play with 700 minutes of listening pleasure. Small shortcoming it is a shortened reading, which does not bother if one never reads the books, but only knows the films.
A nice book for my daughter, she was very happy!
Super book! Read through several times.
Shallow book, just to dream. I bought it to finally have a say in what it is all about the vampires. It has paid off, you can fully immerse yourself in the world!
I only watched the film before I read the book. I like the book much better. I can recommend.
Very exciting! I read the book almost in one go and can now understand the hype surrounding Edward and Bella.
An excellently filmed character study that reverberates intensely. In addition, a great Joaquin Phoenix, who captivates with his presence & gives the best joker of all time. This film is a cinematic pleasure from the 1st to the very last minute...
I can only recommend the film! I was very concerned that the performance of Heath Ledger as a joker could not be surpassed, but I can say Joaquin Phoenix plays the role perfectly! The only thing that disappointed me a little was that you can't find the villain you usually know from Gotham in the Joker until the end.
Joaquin Phoenix picked me up as a joker and tied me up a great actor who was absolutely convincing after Heath Ledgers. Personally, I thought the strip was great. A star print because of the missing Icing. A bit more action would have been nice. But it's a great movie with exciting twists and turns.
I had watched the film in the cinema and just had to have it at home. In between is a bit long-winded, but the story and the tension have to build up.
The content is based on the original, but has some lengths that could have been spared. Nevertheless: 4 stars for the cast and performance of Phoenix.
First half was almost a bit boring, but after that the JOKER came through! The cast is the hammer and the whole plot is very easy to understand.
The film is really good in terms of content. When streaming, the sound isn't quite synchronous and that's annoying. With a 50 Mbit connection, I've never had these problems.
Good film, but I personally find it a bit overrated. In some places it seems a bit long and deliberately "artistic" for the Oscar to come.
The film is more reminiscent of a psychological thriller than a comic book adaptation. I was positively surprised and found the acting performance remarkable. A clear recommendation for people who don't otherwise have Marvel movies or other formats.
Mr. Phoenix was right to win the Oscar. Very good portrayal and also the plot and insight into the drama of Mr. Fleck is shown well and not comic-like. Super movie!
Great origin story of the Joker, great played by the leading actor Joaquin Phoenix. However, the total length could easily have been shortened to 90 min.
The film and especially actors great. That's how I imagined the real joker.
Very profound film with many surprise moments, however, a bit tough in the plot.
Was a great movie. Sometimes too long-winded otherwise ne super entertainment.
Not what I expected, but you can still look at it. He's not bad.
Great film as a single story about the Joker and well cast.
Good representation of the Joker originated. Not easy food ... that is how it can happen to anyone.
The film has a lot to offer. But I don't have a bit of action.
The film is really impressive, but I'm missing a little bit of the icing on the cake. Joker is definitely worth seeing.
Good actor. Worth seeing, although I felt the end was too brutal.
A film that was ahead of its reputation. Joaquin in Oscar mature portrayal. The story is the star next to Joaquin!
Scary, yet good film, where I stayed on until the end. The movie has something and Joaquin Phoenix played the Joker great.
The original story is very impressively told with Joaquin Phoenix as the later Joker. In some places a bit long-winded, a little more action would have helped. Very nicely played.
The film was or is really well done by the story but sometimes pulled a little too long to pull a little less in length would have been better in my opinion. Still recommended great movie.
Mega movie even if you're not so on DC.
Has inserted well into the Batman story. Great character study. Grandiosely played with goosebumps!
The film was good, but it was also very bleak. But it also somehow fits the Joker.
I liked him very much. I wanted a little more action. But there was a lot of drama.
Excellent film! Can I only recommend, fantasticplayed played!
Good movie with an interesting story. However, the end of the film is too abrupt.
Very well done, the role played very well. Can you look again.
On this CD you can find the concert of 1973, which was also released as a concert film. If you don't want to insert the movie every time to listen to the music, this CD is recommended.
Exciting. Prima cinema adventure. Would be happy to watch it several times. Good filming of a big book. Great characters and captivating scenes. Makes you want part 2...
Good film that builds a good arc of tension. Of course, a lot is pulled in the film to have the material for part 2. Still, it's a good movie.
Some details deviate from the book as usual, but otherwise it is close. The handling to borrow the film is as usual from Amazon uncomplicated!
In the seventh part of the Harry Potter series, things get pretty tough. Lots of action, suspense and fight scenes and moments to feel.
I was very satisfied with the item and the delivery time. I would always order or buy something from this buyer.
The film has been an absolute best for a long time. Very good actors.
The CD is fine and the delivery came on time.
Like any of the Harry Potter movies, this movie is very well made, captivating and very exciting!! Good implementation from book to film!
Great story and good movie, it's worth watching! Exciting and entertaining, we are already looking forward to Part 2.
We have read all the books and also seen all the films in the cinema. The quality of the DVD is fine as always.
Great movie with a lot of action, adventure, it's also a bit sad, because you know you can't accompany Harry Potter for long, but the movie does it away again.
You may or may not like the books, but the films are really good. I thought the books were getting worse and worse, but the movies are just well done and I think you should have seen them before.
Nice movie. But it's far from getting to the book. Actors and effects are good. The film is worth seeing.
The filming is good. The book is not, in my view, the best of the series, but the film ingesantient is close to the book and well done by the conveyed mood.
Unlike many other reviews, I thought the movie was right, really good. Parts 5 and 6 I think were definitely a little worse, the parts 1-4 outstanding. I bought the BR, picture, sound, just nice to look at. I really liked the first part of the deathly hallows!!!
Very entertaining film that should not only bring the tears of joy into the eyes of fans. For my part, I was thrilled and would like to recommend the film. But I didn't like the end, so I only give 4 stars. Otherwise a top film with great actors and an exciting story!
Super quality and the sound is great, I'm looking forward to the 2nd part definitely recommended!!!!!!
Have already seen the film like all other parts in the cinema and for the price a must-buy on Blu-Ray.
Well the film has completely exceeded my expectations and the children can not get enough of the movies. It was a good choice to buy the movies.
Just great like any Harry Potter movie, book etc. I've watched the film at least 10 times and I could watch it again and again.
This part is as exciting as any other Harry Potter movie. If you're a real fan, you need them all, so have fun with this episode.
Like all HP films very nice, exciting until the end, but you must not miss a minute, otherwise you will miss a detail.
Great film, for Harry Potter fans a must in the collection and at a top price. So far I have only bought so cheaply from Amazon.
The film is well done and finally has a little more action. All in all super looking forward to the next 2 parts!
Now I have my collection complete and can now start a real Harry Potter evening with all the extras, great.
A really great movie. Needed the dvd version for my collection. What only bothered me was that the case was a bit pressed in, even though I ordered it again.
I don't watch movies like that. He was recommended to me and I have no regrets. He has depth, although I don't like fight scenes that much. The acting performances were good. I particularly like to see Morgan Freeman. I'll probably look at the other parts as well.
Reissued and very successful remake. It is the first part of a trilogy of which each part is worth seeing. Watch!
A great movie. What more can we say about this? Tastes are different, but I like it. He's pretty good.
The prehistory of Batman isn't dealt with in great detail, but there has to be room for action. And there's good action! A must for fans of the Batman movies. I liked it.
Have seen the film several times and like to watch it again and again. I think he's one of the really good Batman movies.
The start of a wonderful trilogy: First of all, I have to say that I am absolutely thrilled with how this film manages to portray Batman. Not as an untouchable superhero, but as a human being. With mistakes and also weaknesses. This takes away the distance of the entire trilogy and makes it so wonderfully close for us stitches. Great!
Great expectations that won't be disappointed with this action-packed film. Great cinema - only Christian Bale falls a little short of his acting possibilities. However, this does not detract from the overall impression. Michael Caine is wonderful again and Katie Holmes is better than expected. Otherwise nice idea to go back to the roots. I look forward to the sequel.
Batman Begins is a brilliant film that lacks nothing, neither comprehensible, nor good story, nor good actors. And if you've ever wanted to see the making of Batman, this film is mandatory anyway. It is definitely recommended to all others.
First time on the film: I think it's really perfect, probably the best Batman of all time. The image quality is very good. 1 point deduction is only available because the BD contains only Dolby Digital 5.1 sound.
Super movie. Christian Bale plays nen cool Batman, the man just fits into the role.
Exciting, cool effects, a really successful movie show with a story that always demands and gets a sequel.
Well done as a film if it doesn't get close to the book, but with the amount of material it is well done and a great substitute if there is no time to read or you are an L.-muffel.
One of the best parts from the series. The characters come into puberty, the childhood is over. The Trimagic Tournament is just awesome as the rest of the film.
The film is well done, but I personally think the book is better. But it's definitely fun to watch the movie.
Harry Potter is the best-selling book that has become a film series and if you have children, you can look forward to a family dvd evening.
Well implemented. As a reader, you miss many enlightening details in the book. Nevertheless, we are repeat offenders in the films. It remains exciting.
As with all movies, the books are always better! But as in the previous parts of the film, this one is also a "fantastic" implementation.
One of the best parts of the Harry Potter saga. A good start to the return of LV and the Tri-Magic Tournament. Worth seeing!
Very great series, great plot, sometimes a bit very brutal, but always varied and sometimes very unexpected actions.
Feeling, every hero you get used to in the last episode dies. But also the hate objects are represented very well and pack you correctly. If you're into medieval stories with dragons and fantasy, you've got it right.
Super series exactly what you expect. The twists and turns in GOT make the whole thing even more exciting and want to see more. The characters play your role really well. Small disadvantage is the quality but from the story really TOP.
Once you start, you can't stop! But very bloodthirsty.
My best friend is very happy, she is a big fan and is very enthusiastic about it.
The 6th season was very exciting. A great story with striking people. The plot is exciting and entertaining until the end.
Super plot, fantastic actors, beautiful landscapes - just a little too much carnage with very high film blood consumption. I'm looking forward to the 8th season.
At last we move on. It is exciting to follow the various actions that have not yet been published as a book. I look forward to the next episodes!
Would like to give half a star more! For 5 stars I have to watch the next episodes! Otherwise, this is a top series!
The season was a gift, so I can't say much about it myself, but according to the gifted person, it's super great.
A very good season! I like the "puzzle" as it keeps dissolving. Everything in German, but the menu is a little weird, as you can't directly access individual episodes. Therefore, one star less. But in itself everything is great!
Great start, but in the course a bit sloping. Therefore only 4 stars. But still, you're giminging about every new episode.
Games of Thrones is a good series, it would be very nice if German television would also jump on this track and start producing good fantasy series.
I expected a lot more from last season. Above all, however, it is not already out after 6 episodes. I very much regret having spent the €20 for this season. If there were 0 stars, I would forgive them.
The film is entertaining, goes further and deeper in the battle scenes and experiences than the "love story" Pearl Harbour, in a few places probably slightly oversubscribed by the flight performances of the then fliers. The film could be shorter but everything in Allen is an entertaining work and you can take advantage of the sourround system.
I wasn't expecting a masterpiece and I wasn't disappointed. Midway is solid popcorn cinema, I don't regret a penny I spent on it, especially since the Pacific scenario was almost unknown to me. Thumbs up!
I'm not a big fan of Emmerich movies, but this one was well done, exciting and entertaining and that's what matters. The actors were also well and appropriately selected. You have to stay fair 4 stars.
The movie Midway i liked very much but unfortunately the 4K disc was already completely unrealistic with the 4K picture. It looked very much like a video game, but the sound got it out again with German cars.
The film is exciting and very well done, great effects. Different, but by no means better than the 1976 film on the subject with Ch. Heston and H. Fonda, among others. Both versions are worth seeing in their own way.
I was granted the Middway UHD version. Visually, it's very good. The story is so well, but that's my taste. For fans of war movies, however, recommended.
A typical Emmerich film, lots of special effects and bangs, big pathos, heroes = big cinema. You probably shouldn't have too high demands on historical correctness, anyway or perhaps because of it, the film has entertainment value.
Great pictures, computer generated, but still good, a lot of pathos for an American story by a German director.
Price performance ratio is right, very good effects, especially with the flight scenes. An all-round exciting film.
I thought the film was very good. It's typically American, but you can imagine that beforehand. Definitely exciting, although some things from Pearl Harbour were known.
If you're into action and effects, you'll like it. Nothing else more or less than Pearl Harbor.
The film is really worth seeing and shows a slightly different view and representation of what happened at that time!
Good fliers Action solid good war movie a must for war movie fans.
Is almost the sequel to Perl Harbor only without romance. Hasnots as announced in the opening credits not much to do with history, but great pictures of epic battles. I like it!
Very good film, at no time boring.
We liked the film.
Can I recommend.
Not a bad movie, it's very well done and it doesn't come up for a long time.
Well-made film about the Battle of Midway.
Beautifully staged, partly bad CGI effects typical Roland Emmerich.
The film is exciting popcorn cinema from the beginning. Good actors, excellent tricks, rousing story with a true background. Of course, one can criticize the "we are the best soldiers in the world" dialogues, but this is also the thing in war films from the 60s, 70s and 80s. We liked it, and that's the only thing that matters to us.
This is the last film of the Stars Wars saga. A must for every fan. I liked the whole Star Wars saga.
Super popcorn cinema, typical Disney Star Wars, can be watched, a must for fans.
Great movie, great actors, great entertainment.
Is not the best Star Wars movie, but by a long way better than its predecessor.
I think it's a good ending to the Star Wars series.
Wasn't the best Star Wars movie but still a pleasure to watch it.
A worthy end to a mixed trilogy. All in all, a really good Star Wars movie with a lot of fan service and nostalgia.
After our children saw the film in the cinema, the DVD had to be made. The film is really very nice, better still than the first part. Unfortunately, the DVD sometimes hooks. Fast delivery with Amazon prime.
A beautiful film, liked as a family, but unfortunately in parts some effort. I would buy it again, the charm of the first part it does not quite reach despite the great story.
Nice second part, which I also liked. However, the child is thrilled. What can we say? Disney has done everything right once again. Film is on German super quality.
Compared to other Disney sequels, the movie is really good. But he can't surpass the first part.
I'm a cartoon fan, the movie, especially Olaf the Snowman, just nice, great to watch.
Great movie. Makes a lot of mood in 3D as well. The posters were immediately hung on.
Great Disney movie , i personally too much singing this time, but the kids liked it.
The first part was better. But the kids are off to it. That's why four stars.
Top quality. Super, our little one is very happy about the DVD.
Not as good as the first part, but you can look at it.
I liked the film. One of the best action movies in a long time. Significantly better than the 2nd part of London has fallen, but not quite as good as Part 1 Olympus has fallen. You don't have to talk about logic here, there are other films for that. Recommended!
The film offers good action. He doesn't quite get to the first two parts. But for nice men's cinema evening always well suited. What is a bit of a pity that early in the film it is revealed who the big unknown villain is and is behind the whole conspiracy. So, of course, the tension is completely lost. But still fine to borrow. But I wouldn't buy it now.
Super movie suspense to the end, top new cast but unfortunately the woman is a different and the president as successor too familiar with him. This is supposed to give the impression that they have been working together for many years and the daughter is too young for that and the house in which he now lives is different. So with a new cast for a multi-parter a bit lame and otherwise a good movie, if you don't want to pay attention to the facts.
Quality of the film was great, sound was also nicely full at home. Otherwise, the film is actually OK, but you can't expect anything for the stimulation of the brain cells. For a weekend movie to be cozy together but completely OK.
I have already seen the film in the cinema and found it good there. Even on the second look, my opinion has napped. Solid made stripes for a quiet Saturday night.
I think this film is a good sequel to Olympus and London has fallen. Good lead actors, good action, only the last bit of depth has been missing to five stars.
Personally, I liked the film. It was interesting how you can do everything with new technologies. You can recommend the film.
Again a great movie but slowly, as with so many others, the air is slowly out - as a third part still super but worse than the other two, if you can talk about bad at all.
I found Angel has fallen a good conclusion to the series and could not comprehend the reviews I read in advance.
A lot of action, the story around it went like this, but the actors were good. Cinema at home was that.
If you are looking for a movie for a cozy popcorn evening, you will find it here. A good action strip that keeps what the trailers promise: entertainment...
Not the strongest in the series, but still absolutely entertaining butler action with lots of drive, cool sayings and a lot of bumbum. With mates and nem cold beer absolutely recommended.
Good action movie. The 3rd out of line. Somewhat predictable. I found the 2 predecessors better. But we're all not getting any younger.
Good movie! Not quite as great as parts 1 and 2! Still worth seeing.
Good film, but the two parts before were much better!
Very exciting sequel is very relaxed to watch.
Very good film but the previous movies were a bit better.
Good action movie. Slightly weaker than predecessor.
The film is packed with action and usually exciting. However, the storyline could be more profound and even more suspense could be generated.
The film is really good. Especially the scene with the drone attack gave me goosebumps. Some action scenes at the end of the film are a bit too long-winded, hence a star print.
Those who like their predecessors will not fall asleep here.
The film is worth seeing, but unfortunately cannot surpass its predecessors.
Exciting, if predictable. Age phenomena of heroes bring real connection.
If you like the parts in front of it, you like them. Just switch off, then noise! and Bumm! and Peng!
Very exciting film personally I liked the first and the second part better!
Was quite good the film but unfortunately not as good as the first part.
Good as the other two.
Very good and entertaining. But the parts before were better.
Nice last Rambo film. A crass twist that you didn't expect. And then nice action and many weapons from the previous Rambo parts are used again. This is very cool, because you can guess from which part of the weapon he is now using.
It's worth watching the movie. And if you're a fan of Rambo, of course it's a duty to see the movie.
A typical Stallone. What no longer fits right is the German voice. Again and again respect for a 73-year-old fit like a sneaker.
Good story, Stallone doesn't play badly, action carnage with sometimes hard scenes, especially the death of the last fiesling is hard!
To be honest, I thought at first, oh ever, someone wants to try again to relive one of his best characters. Is that going well? And yes. That's it. In my opinion, a successful film. Like the old parts, I liked to look at them. Very action-packed and exactly what you expect from Rambo.
The film itself is a good success, but the front part is quite dragging on. Until the showdown, you have the need to rewind from time to time. But the showdown is really hammer, hard action.
I found the continuation of the Rambo series very successful. It shows an aging hero who can't save everyone and needs help!
The film is a real action movie as it must be. He will never reach the cult status of the first Rambo film, but all the other Rambo movies have not reached either.
Der Film ist ein typischer Sylvester Stallone Film. Ich find ihn super.
The naturally older Rambo can still not stop anything. Nice story, not the well-known typical Rambo action scenes, but still very worth seeing.
We ordered the last part of Rambo - Last Blood from Amazon for an action-packed TV evening. It had been a successful home cinema evening again.
Looked without expectation. Was better than thought.
Class action movie. However, a great deal of crude uncensored violence. A good conclusion for the Rambo era.
Very well made film, the age rating of 18 years is justified, since the film is very "brutal" than its previous parts of Rambo. But always worth seeing!
Rather for fans, but they will be satisfied. The first hour you are just happy to see Rambo again, and it is so cozy at times that you are already a little afraid of the upcoming action. But then it's horny - in the last 20 min.
As a child of the 80s, this film entertained me well. Even though Rambo is quite old, it's fun to watch the brutal action.
If you order Rambo, You will also receive Rambo. It should not be taken too seriously. I liked the story amazingly well, but of course everything is completely oversubscribed.
Crass story, hard action. Worth seeing.
I like it very much, only the story is a bit thin and the fighting ten very brutal. Rambo II and Rambo III are the best films in the series. I think Rambo V probably won't be the last. Sly has announced Rambo VI.
Anything Rambofans can expect a retired John Rambo to not be able to show continuous action for two hours is logical and would be "unrealistic."
Sure, there are better movies, but it's not as bad as it's often been rated. It starts smartly and increases in typical, exaggerated Rambo action.
At the beginning you would say bit boring but then totally cool a typical Rambo movie.
A little slow at the beginning. But then in the usual reliability regarding the action with nice allusions to the old parts. Sly knows how to do it.
We liked it. Partly quite violent scenes a la John Wick..
Good movie. You know what you get and the name is program. Unfortunately, the story is quite simple and quite hard-ended. For fans top!
Worthy conclusion of the Rambo series.
Can you watch well if you are on the Rambo movies.
Once different from the other parts. Not badly done.
Generally very good. Action like all Rambo movies.
Very brutal but exciting and good.
Was much better than I expected.
Good movie! At first a little quiet, but then even harder than John Wick. Should have been seen as an action fanatic.
If you like Rambo, you should take a look at the old Rambo. Good action, quite entertaining.
Even if one or the other is rather unrealistic, the film surprised me pleasantly and brought the evening to a nice end. Some laughs and chuckers were there for me and I'm glad to have seen this change.
Nice film, suitable for a relaxing time and a glass of white wine. Nothing intellectual, no depth, just good to calm the nerves.
The film was entertaining, but you could have gotten more out of it. As always, the high-profile cast was outstanding. Especially Jane Fonda. At that age - respect!
I really liked the film. Worth looking at. The actresses are wonderful, I particularly liked Diane Keaton.
I watched the film with a lot of fun. It is not a masterpiece now but very entertaining with many well-known actors.
The great cast carries the film, credible characters, a nice conversation.
Very nice filming. Good actors. The film gives you a good feeling. Anything is possible.
An entertaining film in which you can laugh a lot.
We chose this film for our weekly film evening and were very enthusiastic. This film inspires with wit and charm.
A film with charm and humour!
More of them. The star print is available for a few platitudes.
Super fun film that exaggelessthes the problems of sexuality in relationships and sums it up with a lot of humour.
I bought him blind because he made me curious. Wasn't disappointed after the sighting and the four actresses still look quite young for their age.
Nice film for in between.
Quite okay for a cozy evening.
I liked the film, it was very amusing and entertaining.
Was very entertaining, I enjoyed myself deliciously.
I thought the movie was really good, after I saw the trailer, I wanted to see the movie as well. With wit, charm and top star cast, the film convinced me. I think the more mature women can still have a love life and i don't understand the comments of "foreign shame" at all, especially since I am only 28 and the ladies could be my mothers or even grandmothers. The film entertained me and that's all that matters.
A must for every Marvel fan, Capitan, and what a! Not only does it look great, but it also has the skills to make a worthy first avenger to his will certainly give people who don't rate the movie that way, tastes are just different. Otherwise buy, I got my money's worth.
Fits seamlessly into the MCU universe. Sympathetic actress with busting charm. Story good, and garnished with the usual joke. That's how you imagine good popcorn cinema. If I'm still between 4-5 stars, I don't have anything to worry about, but you still have to leave yourself open to the brilliant movies. Therefore, 4.
In the beginning, the film was a bit enigmatic, the questions of which were clarified and resolved later with an aha effect. Also, the film would have a bit of Star Wars at first. But the film then picked up speed and became more exciting and action-packed. I think you should have seen a few other Marvel movies beforehand to better understand the movie. In the end, I would like to mention, you will now look at cats with a different eye.
Not the Upper Hammer, but absolutely recommended! Much attention to detail, some explanations for past events. As always top selection of actors and great soundtrack. He could have tolerated a little more suspense. Therefore only 4 stars.
Captain Marvel is basically an entertaining movie. Partly a bit tough, but all in all good. The timing for the release was somewhat suboptimal, but the other films in the Marcel universe were all the better for it.
I found it quite entertaining. Close slack in the Marvel universe. Some scenes might have been a bit exaggerated, in some places you could have gone into a little more detail. Otherwise, good entertainment without too much depth.
Surprisingly good! I couldn't do anything with the trailer, so I had little interest in the film, but it turned out to be very entertaining!
A cool and entertaining movie, unfortunately not the very big Marvel throw thereisstill still a lot of space up. For a rainy Sunday or a relaxed Saturday evening despite everything well suited.
A really good movie, I can only recommend to everyone. The DVD arrived in a TOP condition and also very fast delivery the next day.
Not the best Marvel movie but indispensable for the Avengers story. But there are also beautiful moments and also something to smile about.
I liked a great Marvel, a superhero. But be sure to be one of the last two Avengers & the two Guardians of the Galaxy.
Definitely a good film in the Marvel series. Good actress. Find the movie really good from start to finish. But it's just a matter of taste.
Such a well-made film. But I lacked a bit more comedy. As with the other Marvel films.
I was very impressed by the film - I had expected much less - and was very positively surprised - worth seeing!
Yes, the film is really funny due to its journey through time. A nice addition to nden other marvel.
The film is absolutely ok. Good action and entertainment. But somehow I'm missing something about the top rating.
Good story, personally I would have liked a bit more action, is still a very well made movie.
I love these movies. Well done, exciting and many special effects. I'll see them all.
I think the film fits into the Marvel universe quite well, it's made.
For me, one of the strongest movies, from the Marvel universe, though not the No.
A good action movie, also a good superhero movie. Not breathtaking, but definitely recommended for a good entertainment.
Interesting plot, action-packed scenes and a good acting performance. A successful Marvel movie.
This movie is great. If you like excitement and action, you should look at it.
Good story. Cool Marcel figure. Here and there, some scenes seemed a bit strange. 1-2 mistakes have also occurred to me. But it was essentially fun.
Is definitely worth a recommendation. Well done, although I'm not so into superheroes.
I didn't have much expectation of the film and was very positively surprised. I can only recommend Captain Marvel.
Good story from the Marvel world. Good plot, good entertainment. Tension arc is held until the finale. Lots of special effects....
Not bad and certainly important to stay in the event chain, but there was a bit more momentum missing...
The movie wasn't bad! Once you can definitely look at it!
Great movie with good image, sound on DVD level. Used in top condition.
Familiar Marvel's quality for a nice TV night.
Like all Marvel movies, this one is a very good one. I would definitely look at him again.
If you like Marvel movies, you're in good hands here. Good movie, good story, beautiful effects. Overall good addition to the series.
Very entertaining. If you like Marvel, you'll like this movie. Recommended.
The film is well done, no question, but the big story twist around which it builds is somewhat very predictable. You won't be surprised in this film.
Well-made comic book adaptation.
Likes the film very, very much. Was a bit skeptical at first, but the film has everything the Marvelverse has to offer. Jude Law as a great hero and then villain is great.
Film was good, better than expected. Brie got it right.
It's a very exciting movie. Good action scenes and good script. But I give a star deduction for the heroine's overpowering. This film still shows Nick Fury as an agent.
Not the best of all Marvel movies but one of the better ones. Like all new Marvel movies, watching it is a good pastime.
I didn't even know Captain Marvel. It wasn't until Endgame that I saw them. That's just catching up. Beautiful story.
Good film for the series.
Beautiful film, matching the advenger rows. Despite all the criticism, I thought the film was really great.
Beautiful movie in the Marvel universe, entertaining and definitely hoping for a sequel!
Not perfect, but I was well entertained. If you're on superheroes, you should have looked at it.
Great action, great pictures.
I can recommend this film. The movie is fine. The visit to the cinema was worth it. I would look forward to more movies.
Recommended. Everything made a little on comedy. Very good start to the following Avengers strips.
I like to watch the Marvel movies in general, it has nothing to do with reality, but the entertainment value is good.
Enemies - Hostiles. Very quiet and unexcited Western drama. The transformation of the main character is very well implemented and perfectly staffed with Christian Bale. The pictures and the music are a force. Christian Bale proves once again that he would earn the Oscar every year. Great and recommended.
Overall, a really good movie. Story, actors and film editing can convince. For the 5th star, all that is missing is that the red thread of the plot could have been implemented a little better.
With a group of former enemies who suddenly have completely different enemies and are decimated by battle at the end, there is a small happy ending in this brutal race. Worth watching!
A great movie with great actors! The film doesn't really live on much action, but for all the more of its intensity & a well-executed C. Bale. In short; a cinematic feast for the eyes...
Worth seeing. Well-made story about the subject, beloved enemy. Those who respect and honor themselves in the end.
This film convincingly shows historical tensions in the time, but has thoughtful scenes for the present time.
A really moving film! If you like Westerns, who also deal with the psyche of the people and not only glorify the "Wild West", this is the right place!
Good and for me very realistic Western, which represents the hardness of the West very well. Beautiful landscapes and very good history lessons.
The story is well told, the actors bring the sensitive stuff over well.
The film entertains you for the whole 2 hours and 14 minutes. C. Bale plays the role of captain excellent.
This is what it might have looked like in the West, well-made Western
Product and content is worth seeing, impeccable delivery.
Very well played! Absolutely a topic to think about!
Overall beautiful pictures, very good story and entertaining and exciting.
Film is profound, well made and not too overdone.
For a very good film in between.
Film was fine, no cracker but entertaining.
The right thing for Western fans.
Great film with many components in which neither side gets away well.
A good film. Worth looking at it.
Well-made film. The choice of actors is very suitable for this. Beautiful landscape impressions.
Very authentic film! All scenes are used correctly.
I really liked the film. The director has probably dealt seriously with American history.
Very good film. I absolutely liked it. If you are not averse to the subject, be sure to strike and look at it.
The film didn't lose me. The story was kept quite simple, but yet the scenes and actors appealed to me very positively. I think it's a great movie that also appeals to feelings on several strands. By which I mean the individual fates and conflicts of the main actor, mother, healer, drug dealer, the 'good cops', etc. I could even imagine a sequel, even if others will draw parallels with other movies/series again - I don't care
What if someone has superpowers but doesn't itch? The story is refreshingly different from the usual superhero stories. The film is simple and well done and yet you suffer with the characters, because they have no chance as underdogs. And so it comes as it must come, and one succumbs to the dark side of power. The question now is, how do you get out of this mess? I'd love to spoil, but I recommend you watch the movie.
Interesting and exciting film in which a few are equipped with superpowers, but they are pursued by the government. The mother of the main protagonist is ill and he urgently needs money for her treatment. He enters dubious shops and engages in robbery. Turbulent, exciting, pretty, likeable lead actor.
The film was very entertaining. The idea of talented/talented people aroused interest, the story of the film was fine. All in all, it was the right decision to borrow the film for 0.99€. A successful film, but one that doesn't completely "rip you off the stool".
Interesting view. Something completely different, on the superhero theme. I thought you could have made more of the story. Is more of a story in this universe. I would have liked to know a lot more about the conditions and social conflicts. Still, the film was good. I would recommend it.
Actor good, animation well done, exciting. I felt very well entertained and the film ended faster than I wanted.
Bit of the X-Men charm but not quite so twisted. I found it entertaining and the story took me with me.
Good film, good actors and the plot is not unknown but well done.
Chic part. Unfortunately no embossing but very nicely printed in high gloss.
Was everything from action to feeling, the movie was fine.
Fast delivery. Well-made film and good effects.
Was actually a good movie. The end was a bit quick but still worth seeing.
Considering the small budget and the circumstances, the film is magnificently realized. Have followed the creation since the first trailers on Youtube. More, a series of movies would be top!
A thoroughly entertaining film that doesn't just boast effects.
I liked the film, but it's generally a matter of taste.
It's a pity that there were few fight scenes, but otherwise I liked the movie.
It's not bad, but there are better movies.
The film is really good, also visually. I am pleasantly surprised.
Interesting sci-fi story.
Was well entertained.
Very entertaining. I liked it. Tip: View English version.
A really solid performance for a low-budget movie! I liked him. Morally complex characters are created that seem very authentic in all their actions. Precisely the use of the special strengths/forces is dosed and not represented with excessive special effects makes the film very sympathetic! Unfortunately, the story is somewhat flat and predetermined, actually a universe is created in which much more would have been possible, hence 1 star deduction.
There's definitely better, but still good and exciting movie.
Good story!! Can you definitely have a look! 4 stars definitely deserved, sometimes in my opinion all a bit drawn too long!
A pretty good movie! A bit too much imagination, but is good! Can I only recommend more, worth seeing!
I like Super Movie great action.
A beautiful film adaptation of Cats. Great performers. Some songs have been changed a little bit, which I didn't agree with.
The bottom line was that I found the film very successful. Bissel disappoints only because the songs have a very changed text (I saw the musical in Hamburg at that time and still have the CD) therefore only 4 out of 5 stars.
The animation of the characters is a bit strange and very difficult to look at.
The film's theme deals with cybercrime and its possible global threats. The story is well constructed and the actors are convincing. The film entertained me well and I recommend it with a clear conscience.
Good and entertaining action movie. As a relative layman, I'm not sure what's really possible and what's not. It's almost sausage to me, too. This is a good film that doesn't lose tension. Pure entertainment.
A really great video spectacle at its finest. You should enjoy this film in peace and not be distracted. Experience is a duty.
Exciting... Science fiction thriller.... Can you look at it well..... With good action.... Exciting... Science fiction thriller.... Can you look at it well..... With good action.... Well.. Good Better
Since I have no idea about computer science, the whole technical dialogue completely misses me. However, I've also fallen for phishing before, so someone found out my password (Black Widow). In this respect, general fears are addressed. I don't know anyone who hasn't been a victim of cybercrime before.
If you are a bit familiar with computer science, you will like this film. This movie offers a mix of excitement, action and hacking. C. Hemsworth also does his thing as a leading actor very well.
Hemsworth plays his role well, and I also like the other actors. The film is exciting and action-packed. Recommended.
Great pictures and appropriately tuned film music. A not easy story with many side actions. Surely one could have thought about another main cast. All in all, however, it is told in a rousing way. Those who liked Miami Vice will not miss out here.
Really exciting; It stands out from what else there are on the market of thrillers lately...
The story is exciting, the actors great, the action well done and the complete presentation really great. With 130 minutes quite long, so before tortillas ready + two beers cold. Since I find Chris 'Thor' really awesome, the film captivates me. Thumbs up!
I don't think the film is bad at all. The image and sound quality is very good. The film length of more than 2 hours would not have been necessary. For me not a top film but a good film.
I watch such films because I am interested in art and of course I have very capable artists involved in such films. And I wasn't disappointed, this movie is very beautiful.
The film is quite funny, but certainly not with the depth, as you are used to from the Pixar studios. To switch off all times good and also adults will have their fun. For the younger ones it is already a little sad in some places and possibly too much action.
For once, an animated film that doesn't get too boring for the children. Here is "mangamoderate" action from start to finish. Really good animations and a not too thin action with sniffing potential.
This movie is entertaining and fun. It's worth taking a look and enjoying. Ambition is not very high.
Was definitely a positive surprise for me. Very funny, imaginative and entertaining. Definitely lifted my rather moderate mood.
Very nice animated movie. In the beginning it quickly rushed through the action. Otherwise good story, very funny, droll and beautiful to look at.
Baymax was a rather entertaining children's film, which even adults can watch well. Exciting, funny and also a few emotional moments.
Great film, easily predictable plot but still full of new gags through the design of Baymax. A movie I'm going to buy.
Beautifully done, but I was hoping for more funny scenes. Otherwise absolutely worth seeing. Very enjoyable entertainment for the whole family.
Has a different theme and is therefore quite entertaining. Reminded me of the book 'Lord of All Things' because of the Mircobots...
Great film for big and small. Funny, excitingsweet but also sad.. of all a bit. Will you like to see him again.
We love this movie and so it was clear that the DVD would follow! So you can look at it again and again!
Beautiful and funny film, both for children and adults. Many funny scenes but also some sad ones.
A great film for young and old. As with most animated movies, the 3D effect is fantastic. All in all highly recommended.
Super cute funny movie, you can definitely watch! As always with this film, the characters are sweet to fall in love with.
My son is 10 years old and found the film great, exciting and funny and also a bit sad, but also with a nice ending.
Sometimes sad and yet quickly again very funny. You can only like Baymax. So not just for children.
Hello. Very good film for young and old. Good story. A little wild. Action otherwise good story and more ...
The film is very funny and shows a lot about family and friendship. Beautifully done and not just for children.
Baymax is a beautiful, funny film for the whole family with a lot of emotion. Is definitely worth seeing!! Should have seen.
Don't have to laugh like that for a long time. The film is funny and Baymax is just cute. Hopefully a second part will come.
A very touching story with a few quirks that don't bother any more. I only borrowed it because it only cost 0.99€.
A film that also encourages reflection. A story that appeals to all age groups. A film to recommend. Super!
A very beautiful film that even adults can watch with enthusiasm! The plot is understandable for the given age group but not so "flat" that as a parent you have already seen through it at the beginning and knows how the film ends.
Well-made animated film that has charm, is cute and likes. The emotions were very strongly emphasized, so that it comes over (exaggeratedly) like a tear-jerker. Therefore, four rather than five stars.
My son loves this movie. The film is super made and entertaining. 5 stars for the film. A star deduction because it is not available in English.
Sometimes to "roar", but in places also the classic animated film with too long supposedly interesting scenes. All in all worthwhile for a relaxed film evening.
Watched the movie with my two children (6 and 11) and we were all well entertained. Not a milestone of the trick technique but a nice story with funny characters and an understandable message for the kids.
When a character came into the picture that looked like Stan Lee, I only realized it was a Marvel comic book adaptation. In any case, it has succeeded. The film is fun for young and old. Not a TOP movie, but really good entertainment for animation lovers.
A super nice movie for children and adults. Good action and open conclusion. I am already looking forward to a sequel.
Easy fun food that offers simply uncomplicated and exhilarating entertainment. Away from dozens of new infusions of well-known characters, the film creates a new hero - even if the story is of course already available in a similar form. Turn on, smile, be entertained - no more and no less.
Baymax once seen and was thrilled. This film was both sad and mega funny. Really good action and implementation. It was fun to watch.
Very worth seeing for the whole family, also a little sad therefore to be recommended only from six years. Kids watched the film twice in a row
Baymax creates a good atmosphere and, in my opinion, is not just for families with children. The wonderfully animated characters and the light story provide good entertainment. Can definitely recommend the film!
Prima entertainment. Distinctive characters. Surprising twists and turns do not cause boredom. Fun and action are perfectly mixed. The individual figures are also very well described and drawn.
A film for the whole family, which is about grief processing, anger, sibling love and friendship. Nicely made, a film for a cozy evening.
An insanely good animated film. Although it does not replace Hotel Transylvania from the top of the animated films, it is highly recommended for all lovers of this genre.
An entertaining animated film for a family home evening together. Nice idea to release a movie with more music. Overall, of course, very light entertainment.
A beautiful film that you like to watch. Great figures and beautifully implemented. It could have been implemented even better, but one should not complain too much.
It was a lot of fun to watch this movie with the whole family.
A cute movie with wonderful voices. The film is cute to watch, the voices are bombastic, but for me it's not a MUST-MAN-HAVE movie.
A film for true music lovers! Partly a bit long-winded, yet entertaining and emotional.
Good movie, you can definitely watch. Certainly often enough in real life.
The film is different, very beautiful overall and sad in the end. The music is great made and therefore catchy.
I've seen the movie before, but I also want to give others this "film enjoyment". The film is so diverse in my view that many things are only seen at multiple awards.
Bittersweet love comedy with great music and perfect dance inserts. A film for the whole family with very credible chosen protagonists. Worth seeing.
If you like music movies, you will love them. I found the film super refreshing, especially for a love movie. The film has rightly been awarded several times.
Very nice musical movie, you can immerse yourself in a beautiful story of course again with a love story and you just feel along with it.
Johnny Depp in his role as Captain Jack Sparrow is super funny again and the rest of the film is much better than the previous one. The first parts are not quite available, but the film is still very worth seeing. I particularly like the fact that the beginnings of the young Jack as captain are also illuminated and the story of the character is further developed in this way.
A well-made film in the best Pirates of the Caribbean tradition. Good story, impressive special effects, great actors. Let's see what's next...
Good sequel. It's not easy to find new adventures for a movie. But it has succeeded.
Personally, I like all the curses of the Caribbean parts and find this one again totally funny.
As the parts of Pirates of the Caribian are like.....nice entertainment. Still, it's a nice sequel. It's great that all the old actors are with us, albeit some only the last minute.
I liked the film because it had the old charm again. Perhaps it would also be good to film the prehistory of Jack Sparrow.
Interesting and great animated sequel to the Curse of the Caribbean series. Good cast and stunning special effects. Well-embedded story with an ending that looks like a sequel.
Absolutely recommended! Exciting and entertaining!
In my opinion, one of the best successors to the famous "Curse of the Caribbean".
Finally a very entertaining movie in the Pirates of the Carribean series. In my opinion, the last films have often been very confusing. Here the joke is sometimes in the foreground again. Powerful scenes and a clear story complete the whole thing. A beautiful film for a cinema evening.
Have seen the film in the cinema it is in my opinion a successful continuation of the previous movies.
Like all films in this series, this one has again been well done. Jonny Depp in high form. Colorful film with a lot of action and humor.
Nicely done, quite funny, gets to the first parts. History is okay. The end leaves room for further part.
Simply a classic curse of the Caribbean with Jack's jokes but this time with more family love and a good ending!! Definitely film you have to have seen and for rent is worth its 5 euros.
Super movie. Effects have once again been perfect. Action and funny sayings. A perfect film. Story ends as with the parts before. "What do you think will happen next"
The setting and the set design as in the others share excellently, the story is pretty much always the same, Johnny Depp plays his role as usual, quite well. Recommended for all fans of the last parts, special effects bomb, as always.
If you love the series, you also love this part. Good action and image plus sound! Have fun with it, thank you
Ok, but not outstanding.
Again and again you can look at it.
You have to have seen all the parts. But as expected, it's a movie, not like the first three, but you can watch.
Good film for a relaxing evening. No special message but good entertainment. Almost all of the old characters get their time again.
A really successful sequel to share the previous ones. While you can see that the story is getting more and more degraded, it's still a very good movie for adventure fans
Salazar and his crew are fantastically done. This part has again succeeded. However, I don't like a small section at all.
A good conclusion to the series. Here the strengths of the previous films 1-3 are taken up again. After the weak 4th part a reconciliation. If Part 6 were to come, a new story would probably be told.
The film is very good pastime and is definitely recommended. The story is well and very beautifully presented.
Really funny and as usual well implemented sequel! Can I recommend.
A very exciting part of the curse of the Caribbean series. It was fun to see him. Everyone who loves the curse of the Caribbean should definitely watch the movie.
A good film in my opinion the product has arrived without defects.
The film is magnificent. Great pictures and effects. Unfortunately, Jonny Depp isn't exactly the best in this film in his role. But the film is still worth seeing.
Story not quite as good as with the first parts, but great popcorn cinema and great pictures. Great adventure, has been fun.
Good film, welcome.
It has become a good film from Jonny Depp's pirate film series, but nothing more. Used to good pictures and action.
Except for Johnny Depp's altered synchronisation, the film was witty and well-designed. The story is also interesting. But there should have been a little more action.
Finally curse of the Caribbean as you know it from parts 1 to 3. Worth seeing for me. If you're a fan, look in.
It's not the best film in the series (in my opinion) but it's entertained me quite well. It's worth watching.
The film fits the first two films well and I like it much better than number 3 and 4.
Has revived the old charm of the first three parts, which unfortunately fell a little short in part four. Worth seeing.
Some very good gags and slapsticks, done really well for a 5th episode. Johnny Depp still in top form. Recommended!
I can only recommend this film, it is quite suitable for families. It's certainly not the best part of the series but still funny and the right one for grey winter days.
Very well and excitingly made. Partly, however, a little blunted as you can foresee some things, if you know the other parts of the film series.
I liked him very much, but I also like this series. Successful sequel to a great film series! Top!!!
Although the role of Johnny Depp is so slowly exhausted, the film is worth seeing in itself.
Not super spectacular, but good entertainment. It's quite possible to look at it. But part three is, in my opinion, the best.
Don't get to the first parts anymore. But it's a solid movie with good gags. Usual good popcorn cinema. Johnny Depp as ever.
Is one of the better of the series, definitely worth seeing Quali and Tone Top. But don't get my opinion on Part 1.
Very good film in my opinion very good plot. If it was fun to look at him, it's also something for family and co.
Super movie with round plot. Johnny Depp finally back in original voice. Look forward to the next part!
I found the film entertaining and action-packed like the other parts. In my opinion, it pulls a little bit in the middle.
You can look at it very well if you are on Curse of the Caribbean or Captain Jack Sparrow. Verdict: Good film.
Once again a successful part of the Pirates of the Caribbean series. Entertaining, beautiful to look at, but not quite as stunning as the previous ones. But as always, this is a matter of taste and personal feeling. Worth seeing definitely.
Ok, at the end I would have liked more action. Otherwise great movie. Can you definitely look at it.
I'm not a fan and was surprised how well the fifth part entertains. Javier Bardem is great as a villain. Worth seeing.
A lot has already been written about the content. For me as a Marvel fan, it's a MUST you can watch again and again. It's certainly not the most action-packed film in the series, but it's important for the entire course and contributes to the understanding of endgame. Actor top. Sound and image are also top.
I thought the film was really good. Joke, suspense, drama, extraordinary chases - all with it! I particularly liked the self-ironic joke in this film, some of which was very well implemented. For example, even the very frequent use of the term "quantum" is beautifully "criticized" in a self-ironic, witty remark. I fluctuated between 4 and 5 stars, but 5 stars actually only get movies with an impressive, deeper message - that's why there are "only" 4 stars from me. Nevertheless - Marvel at its best, recommendation for every Marvel fan!
We liked the film very much, like almost all Marvel movies. We thought it was good that the film does not join the end-time story, but has its own story. Sometimes the sayings are a little flat. We have already experienced them better. But all in all a very good film.
For a rainy Sunday, it was just the thing. But I found the first part a little better, but it was really good for a transfer.
Was well entertained. Action mixed with some humour. Story manageable. Had a fun evening, what more could you want.
Certainly not the best Marvel, but still great entertainment. Purchased for completeness. The Post Credit Scene closes the circle chronologically. Just don't think and let it work.
A good film and as a second part a very good addition with good scenes and action.
Very exciting but I found it a bit confusing from time to time. Still, the film was very captivating.
Good entertainment at Marvel level! Funny sayings and action too often!
Recommended for Marvel fans. Familiar mix of action and wit.
Good movie with funny scenes and alternative story.
Very good film. Have everything you would expect from a Marvel movie. Action, humor, love and drama. Recommended. Also for kids ok.
Personally, I like very, very good, also the fact that the story is taken up from Ant-Man and also builds on it, the end makes a lot of promise, I look forward to the further development of the MCU.
The film is a lot of fun again. Even if I found the first Antman a little better.
In my opinion, the film was a good follow-up film compared to the first part.
Very good film. Enough action and also to smile.
Met my expectations. Superhero movie with humor. I like it, like the first Ant-Man.
Easy fare for big and small tension joke and open end.
The film reflects the same sense of humour as the first part. Vllt. not the best Marvel flick, but still very entertaining.
I liked the film. It's funny and you'll be well entertained for 2 hours. Would recommend it at any time.
Good movie with great special effects. Story a little simple but still good to see.
Great effects, not only spectacle, but also with wit.
Film is thrilling, has suspense and the animation is challenging.
Ant Man is always something different in the Marvel universe. Mysterious, cleaner, more likeable. The Allstar 80s cast with Michael Douglas and Michelle Pfeiffer as Ur Ant Man and Wasp skilfully round off the fun for an older audience. Boring, funny, no revelation, but a successful sequel. Recommended.
Great movie, great actors. But honestly, every part is the same story, sorry. Actually, I was expecting something different.
Very exciting film with many backgrounds. You have to be careful and concentrate to get along, otherwise you lose the thread here very quickly.
An excellent, exciting action film, albeit somewhat predictable (death of Nicky or the transformation of Heather Lee). Otherwise, the film has everything you would expect from a good action movie, and the characters are cast with very good actors.
The film is certainly not the strongest of the series but exciting and solidmade with cool stunts. Continuation will certainly follow again.
Realistic film with action and good deeds and scary how far intelligence agencies can go.
Good solid action film in the best "Bourne" manner with an edgy, authentic Matt Damon and good settings.
I think the film series is good. This part was also shot in the style of the rest of the series.
Great film with many exciting moments. Matt Damon as an actor - just great!
Fully exciting and up to date, highly recommended for action fans.
As always exciting 
I liked good action, logical and comprehensible, so on. Few questions remain, I look forward to a continuation.
Tension from start to finish, very worth seeing, but unfortunately this film does not quite reach the level of the first three films.
A movie with a lot of action. The story is understandable but not particularly exciting. Nevertheless, it is recommended.
I liked the film, but not as good as the first parts. Top cast, great stunts, exciting as usual.
I am a Bourne fan from the first hour and was curious how they wanted to continue after the interlude with Mr Renner. The film is successful, even if it does not reach the explosiveness and speed of the first parts. For a relaxed winter evening and action lovers, this film is recommended.
As a fan of the Bourne movies you have to watch all the sequels. Of course, you already know what to expect. Action, CIA... Bourne, revenge. As always well done. Has no lengths - but there is nothing new. Nevertheless, I felt very well entertained.
This film shows in frightening clarity that there is no longer so-called privacy. Great action. The best in a long time. You can only look forward to the next movie!
Exciting, conclusive, hard. Matt Damon got wrinkles and a reasonable voice. The shop is already running. For me, the best Bourne movie. Point.
Basically a good continuation of the other parts of Bourne with good action, excitement and important facts about the death of Bourne's father. The whole thing takes place in several cities, once in Berlin, then in Las Vegas etc. and it remains exciting all the time, is elaborately made and well budgeted. However, it's not a movie you absolutely have to watch, if you've seen so many thrillers or expect something unsurpassable from the Bourne sequel.
For Karl May fans, the entry into the Inca era has been successful. Many will hardly know the South American novels and can sniff some Indian air here, seasoned with a lot of excitement. Interesting the 2-disc version, which brings not only the German version but also the internationally distributed version.
A really worth seeing movie with very good actors. He has a few lengths in the middle section and even in the end it gets a bit unlikely, but still very entertaining!
Grandiose film and a must-have in the collection. Negatively noticeable about the technology are the low resolution of the cameras during the non-IMAX scenes and the raised black value, which makes the night sky appear gray.
Recommended. Cozy film evening interesting in the story u in the representation of some scenarios relatively realistic and emotional. Very entertaining.
The film is not an easy meal, but it is very well thought out and absolutely worth seeing. I can only recommend it.
Good film with beautiful pictures in the best quality.
We like the genre of science fiction very much .. the beginning of the film was slow, the wormholes were well realized, the end to Hollywood!!! 
Although some of the scientific stories in the film are inconclusive, I think the film has succeeded. Recommended for a nice evening.
The film is definitely worth seeing. Not overly action-packed - but very excitingly constructed. Sometimes a little different from the standard.
The film was very well done and really got a go. The end, on the other hand, was a bit freaky. But definitely recommended.
A successful sci fi with good special effects. Very interesting from the plot's point of view. The plot is exciting, in some parts long-winded or confusing. I watched the film late at night and didn't fall asleep.
Always fascinating how different life can be. Here you get an idea of it. Bite too much Hollywood lard in the depiction of human relationships.
Great film, at the end some heavy food! The theory of relativity is illustrated, which makes it a little more comprehensible. In the end, however, the film is a little difficult to understand.
On the one hand, the topic is great and sometimes also interestingly implemented. On the other hand, it is sometimes a bit long-winded and lacks logic in the last but decisive consequence, therefore 4 stars.
You have to be careful so that you don't lose the thread. Especially towards the end. A well-made film about the future and the past, about space and time. When you think about it, it's crazy - but good.
The film is very long and the story is sometimes scary. At the end it gets a bit cheesy. But overall a very entertaining film. I liked him. If you like First Contact, you will like this film.
A really good film not too exaggerated and also not too little. The story is very good and visually it is also the hammer. There's a star deduction from me because the ending is a bit weird, but that doesn't mean you don't understand it. I don't want to go into that in more detail because of spoiler.
Very entertaining. An exciting story - well implemented in terms of acting. Little effect-hating. Let's do something different! Recommended for those looking for exciting evening entertainment.
Very well done, gives an insight into the space travel of the future, with its problems through space and time. A person alone on a planet, that can't go well.
Really entertaining, although very long. Felt very well entertained. Unfortunately, such films are made far too rarely.
Finally, another film that takes up the question of time and space in a completely different way, and despite a human need for security and security, does not deviate too much into the sentimental.
I was very impressed with the film. Overall idea is very interesting, physical and other technical terms are dosed and comprehensibly used, the actors are good and the pictures of course great. Recommended.
The film begins as an ordinary "I'll save the world for a moment" and becomes more and more interesting. Knowledge of astrophysics and theory is advantageous. Tension and action are present and are reduced by a somewhat long-breathed display felt.
First of all, I think that such a film with a length of almost three hours can be quite exhausting. Overall, however, the film was good with a surprising ending.
Powerful, coherent story and very good actors. Only the end of the film sometimes seems a little illogical to me. Nevertheless, absolutely worth seeing.
Beautifully made film, with many interesting scientific ideas, where I have no idea, however, whether this would really be so conceivable or logical. The ending I found a bit strange, but nevertheless I found the film very attractive. Would probably look at him again.
Very good film despite the length. With an end that you wouldn't expect. It's really worth looking at. 
Overall, a good and exciting film. The characters are convincingly depicted. The focus is more on the relationships and development of the characters than on action. Unfortunately, it drops sharply towards the end.
If the film was quite exciting and well done, I felt well entertained all the time. The image and sound was also very good.
The whole story was really exciting. Only - the end was not so the "yellow of the egg", the end rather disappointed me.
If you look beyond some inconsistencies, the film is quite interesting and contains some surprises. Really remarkable is the scene inside the black hole.
Very good film to the end. This one is pretty imaginative and well - you must have seen it.
A pretty good Nolan movie but he has already made better movies like Prestige or Memento. Nevertheless, definitely worth seeing!
Describes with great actress and very good plot the practical effects of relativity theory and the time distortion through black holes, which have been confirmed by recent research.
The film has overlength and gets a bit confused at the back. Otherwise good idea and good implementation. You can look at it.
You can look at it well. Goes very, very long the movie. But without getting bored. Imagination is in demand towards the end.
The film only gets exciting in the middle of it and is not easy to understand if you are not familiar with the space issue. It would probably be worth watching him twice.
Very good and entertaining film. The conclusion can certainly be disputed. McConaughey is quite convincing. Successful entertainment that has dragged on a bit.
Reminiscent of Event Horizon. Still worth seeing. A must for all SF fans. There is not much more to say about this.
The film was very interesting and exciting only the end I found a bit complicated and not so good. Otherwise great movie.
Good idea and well implemented sometimes pulls something but you know that from over-length movies. Talked to me well.
A good, coherent and little action-heavy film, but one that buckles a bit on its logic. Still, Matthew McConaughey plays a great role.
Actually a great movie. With a running time of almost 3h, there is of course a few minutes with idling. Nevertheless, I found the story exciting and well told. If you could give half the stars, I would have 4.5 stars.
A mixture of Gravity and Odyssey2001 in space. Entertaining and leaves room for subsequent discussions about dimensions, black holes and Einstein's theory of relativity. A good acting performance by everyone, especially McConnaghy.
Interstellar is two-thirds good, but I don't think the last third is all too good. Acting very good. My conclusion: Can you take a look.
The film captivates above all with its wonderful pictures, which would certainly look great on the big screen! Especially the scene where they fly through the wormhole. The story is also very nice and with the "time shifts" I find great solved!
An entertaining film, complex through travel in space and time, dark by looking at our dark future with pollution and hunger. Intelligently made, exciting as well, bit of science fiction, bit of relationship and family drama, bit of fantasy, all in it for good entertainment for an evening.
As some reviewers have written, the story has some physical and logical holes. But this is compensated for my feeling by the intense actors, especially the father-daughter relationship touched me. Worth seeing - an SF movie with handkerchief potential - that's not so often!
Exciting movie ... To watch. I was so excited. Since he goes long, I found, the time quickly passed. I'm sure I'll look at it again.
A fairly realistic, mostly credible adventure, some of which is even based on scientific foundations. Amazing what you can do with applied time dilation. The human factor is also not neglected. I also think it's nice that this SF adventure can do without large-scale slaughter. Worth seeing, it reminds me of the movie "Odyssee 2001" by Stanley Kubrick.
The almost three hours passed as if in flight. Watch out even for longer scenes, otherwise you lose the red thread. Great end.
Class movie. Story good, somewhat predictable in places. Otherwise a great movie for Sunday night. Length is great with just under 3 hours.
Exciting, if initially a bit long-winded, the story takes surprising turns. Great pictures. Unfortunately, the end is not complete.
Super exciting film, leading actor plays world class! A doomsday scenario that is not only 08/15 as seen in many other movies.
We had fun with the film, a point deduction for the fact that it was totally unrealistic in the end. Still, it was fun.
It's a good movie not as good as everyone touted but still very good and especially for all space fans a must.
Good entertainment, the end stimulates reflection and doesn't necessarily please everyone, like me, but I was able to make friends with it.
Something for the grip and entertainment, who really understood the film, has certainly learned something about life and its possible meaning.
Well staged film with great actors. The end was a lot. a bit different than expected but a really worth seeing movie.
Prima Film. Action has some weaknesses, but still good. Not 5 stars because the speech intelligibility is severely affected by the film music.
Beautiful film. What can you say about a movie that you like to watch and therefore buy and download.
I wouldn't have thought that a film that basically has only two actors can be good. The film surprised me, it was by no means boring, the time has passed like in flight.
Definitely something new, whether you like it, is certainly a matter of taste. We found it great and thoroughly exciting. Some scenes are simply great made, the earth in the background the little Sarah in front of it... Well staged.
The film itself banishes you from the beginning. The effects are great. But recommend a very, very large 3D TV to create a similar cinematic enjoyment.
You really get excited with but in between you are very confusing, but all in all it's worth watching the movie.
The pictures you can see here are already very successful, the depth effect of the 3D is strong. The story,.. Well, it's a bit boring, so you don't want to watch the movie more often (that's just my opinion). The 7 Oscars are definitely exaggerated. Still a great movie.
Good science fiction movie.. I don't know why the film is so bad. I think he's done well. Thanks!!
Good entertainment, always exciting. Partly exaggerated. Was satisfied. If a film is from the age of 12, so it doesn't offer popping. Would look at him again.
Class-made film, but one has to give one to think about depositing even more scrap in space. Many more will fly into space. Sandra Bullock plays really well and G.Cloony is a brightpar excellence.
The story is exciting, the leading actress very sympathetic and the viewer feels, unfortunately and trembles along. The images of space are impressive and I wish we had watched the film in cinema on the big screen.
The film is quite entertaining and I find the idea interesting. Sandra Bullock and Georg Clooney are absolutely capable of filling a movie on their own. The 3D effects are not exaggerated. I find the end a little surprising.
Wouldn't have thought this film would knock me off the stool. There's not much happening in this movie, but these very good pictures, survival all and this drama. simply gripping.
Absolutely worth seeing for fans of space. Otherwise, unfortunately, sometime a bit long-winded. Nevertheless worth seeing, the two are already in good shape.
The film is good evening entertainment with huge pictures and made exciting. Great realism cannot be expected, because the facts and physics have been sacrificed to the storyline.
The cause of the accident is not so absurd. And the story has a happy ending for Sandra Bullock. In between there are great pictures and sometimes you didn't feel far away from space.
It's a good movie, but had a little else to expect. Not a typical ScyFi movie, with great actors.
The film is very excitingly shot. Great special effects. Super acting performance by Sandra Bullock. But sometimes scenes are somewhat unrealistic. Therefore only four stars.
I can only recommend this movie to fans of sci-fi, has its lengths, but all in all a good story.
Nervous and powerful. And only with two actors. Not without reason, the film received an Oscar in various categories (e.g.: For the screenplay).
Great suspense, but unfortunately I personally find the film too short. Brilliant images from the point of view of an astronaut and super played by Sandra Bullock.
Interesting film. Beautiful pictures, some action and excitement. No exaggerated action cinema! I found the film quite entertaining, but you shouldn't expect too much.
An exciting film about a space mission that goes wrong and then keeps governments around the world in suspense. Pure thrill, sometimes very oppressive.
Very good film, with brilliant actors. George Clooney and Sandra Bullock play sensationally together. Ingenious shots of space. It never gets boring.
Short-lived without claim, but for suspense is provided and recommended for a film evening at home. I wouldn't have gone to the cinema for that.
The film is good! But not perfect. The pictures and scenes look great, and you long camera rides without cuts create a great impression of the space station etc. Unfortunately, the story remains a bit barren. She didn't grab me despite great actors playing great.
It is not the best film of the series but solidly made and you will learn some backgrounds and the beginnings of the NFFA and the Purge. Good for a movie night with friends if a little action, horror and blood is wanted.
Be sure to look at them if you already know the others. Good for a men's evening. Best all parts in a row.
The story is thoughtful and you get caught up in the film very quickly. The actors do their job well and the action is sufficient. Depressingly, one wonders to oneself how one would behave on a Purge night. I liked the film, but I found The Purge: Anarchy a tick better.
I really liked the story, actor and generally just top the movie. I can recommend anyone. The film definitely makes you want more.
The film impresses with great pictures and breathtaking action scenes. I didn't like the fact that at some point - typically American - the story came back to a happy ending. There were virtually no more surprises, because it had to go well. A real Hollywood strip. But a good one!
Very exciting film. I think he has some lengths. But on the other hand, he is also very much alone on Mars for a very long time. Through these lengths you can feel a little bit how long a long time can actually be ... Can only recommend it as an exciting full-night film for the whole family.
Super movie, I would like to recommend further, has a lot of excitement and wit. Should there be more of this quality.
I was expecting "a little more Mars", but the film is really exciting and goes more in the direction of "Apollo 13" (Houston, we have a problem) - with exciting rescue operation. The substance would also have been sufficient for two parts: the survival attempt and the rescue attempt.
Nice movie, fun to watch, but sticks to solving the real problem, shows only the usual hero pose for the American heroic community, we are the greatest and create everything! But typical of Ridley Scott! Still, look at him! My recommendation.
Great film with outstanding images. After I had first read the book and was a bit bored by the very many technical information, the film is relatively simple. There are also at least two problems that still appear in the book. But still a great implementation and made exciting.
Good and exciting film, the actors play it convincingly, every minute I enjoyed very much.
Ridley Scott proves once again in the Martian that he has a knack for putting characters in the foreground. The Mariner is so accurately and lovingly staged that Matt Damon's loneliness is credibly transported on Mars, without which the film has significant lengths.
When I watch a movie, I just want to be entertained. Whether something is illogical or not, I don't care. With the Martian I liked the story, the acting performance was also okay and all in all I had a nice movie evening. Therefore 4 stars.
The film is just great. It's funny, exciting, interesting. There are great actors and also the story is really great. I can only recommend. But goes very long the movie, no "normal" length.
A great movie. I expected less. Interesting story with a good implementation. For me personally, it could have been a little shorter. The bottom line, however, is worth seeing!
A very entertaining film with more wit than expected. But with less suspense than hoped. So a very good film, but it doesn't fully live up to expectations!
An exciting and entertaining film. The actors are all authentic and good in their roles from the bench. The basic idea has been there before, but still well brought over.
Good film that fills the almost two and a half hours loosely and effortlessly. It's not as action-packed as you'd expect, but the humour of the characters is very refreshing and not set up.
Excellently made Hollywood film (in both a positive and a negative sense), but overall good entertainment. 
Great film, suspense, lots of humour. Very worth seeing. Interesting how Mark Watney survives on Mars, where there is no life. The voltage does not decrease for a second, even though the film goes over 2 hours.
Good movie! It's worth watching, even if you've learned a lot from the trailer. The best was the humorous contributions of the main actor.
Good idea and interesting ways to think about survival in space. Very well played. Visually absolutely fantastic. The landscape very realistic.
Absolutely recommended, without much action exciting and exciting. The plot is the star, Matt Damon plays fantastic. I would also like to watch the film again.
Not a second of boredom, stunning pictures and a very good Matt Damon!!! A few inconsistencies as I find. (flight duration and rescue operation and food supplies) but very worth seeing!
Very well staged film, the plot and the presentation are very realistic. The will to survive of the individual has succeeded very well, adapting to the situation.
Pulp Fiction is an absolute classic and a must in any collection. The Collectors Edition enhances the film even further...
Tarantino's great success, with everything that goes with it: an entangled plot, dialogues that sparkle with meaningful futility and one of the greatest star performances ever. A film that creates a whole new genre: the Laber Drug Baller Movie! Not necessarily suitable for a popcorn cinema evening, but ingenious.
An excitingly staged thriller with a star cast. Idea and implementation ensure an entertaining film experience. The end leaves some questions unanswered. Highly recommended, the price is reasonable.
I'm not usually a big fan of DiCaprio, but he did a good job in this movie and got the role done well. A movie for a nice popcorn evening.
Great movie with a quirky but funny story. Very good effects and surprising film history. Just the right thing for a nice "cinema evening".
Was a little too confused for my husband, but in the end he liked it anyway. I pretty much went along with it. I have already seen the film for the 3rd time and find it well done. Leonardo isn't my favorite actor, but he's pretty good at film.
I really like the story and count this movie among my personal favorites. The film hardly misses anything and lets the viewer ask a few questions. A round thing.
The idea and implementation is excellent. The genre is unfortunately not absolutely my style, otherwise I would find this movie quite possible awesome. Definitely worth looking at.
You need something to know what the film is about, but then you are quickly captivated by the story.
Super movie! However, you should stay with it from start to finish, otherwise you lose the thread. But absolutely worth seeing.
As if steel clips had come out of the armrests of my armchair, the plot of this film captivates so much. The image quality impresses with the (dream landscapes) shown, but not so much convinces of the technology. Sound is well mixed and quite worth 5 stars despite "only"DD 5.1 Many extras attached.
I expected more from this film, but it's certainly really worth seeing. A good story, a few effects, succeeded in itself.
I cannot understand the bad criticisms. I found Jurassic Word 1 the best part so far (compared to Jurassic Park) also in Part 2 I was not disappointed. Apart from the good graphics, the actors are simply top. Since the scenery in the first part was of course more interesting and occurs here only briefly at the beginning and after that everything only plays in the villa .. a star deduction.
We borrowed this film from Amazon, because we have seen all Jurassic movies so far and of course it shouldn't be missing. I don't want to spoil anything here. We didn't regret watching him, but he was a bit predictable.
The film is more for diehard dino fans, as are Jurassic fans. It would be good if you've seen the other Jurassic movies, but it doesn't necessarily have to be. Because it's already an independent film. But it's an advantage if you at least know the story of Jurassic Park and Jurassic World. For die-hard fans, a must!
I found the film really exciting; especially the dinos are very nicely animated; Story also okay. 1 star deduction, because I found part 1 in sum simply better (subjective assessment). However, I would recommend everyone to look at this part 2.
Yes, of course, from a historical point of view, the film is anyway nonsense, just as it is from the construction point of view. People breed dinos and die in the end. As always. Still, I kind of like the movie. He's really well animated and I find these fights really exciting. Definitely worth a look, even if it won't please everyone.
Personally, I liked the film very, very much. He can even keep up with the first part of the current films. Of course, he doesn't get close to the original Jurassic Park, but it doesn't have to and shouldn't!
Well-made film with a recurring story to put the greed of the human being in the foreground and to do everything for it. Personally, I find Jurassic World far more successful.
You don't mind watching the film. Good entertainment for those who have already seen the 100 parts of Jurrassic Park. Same action, slightly different. Good actors, nice action scenes.
The idea of the film is based on the story of Jurassic Park 3. The film is nevertheless recommended, as it was very excitingly realized. I particularly like the open end.
One marvels, a very successful continuation. I found the film very exciting and well told. I think there's another movie to come.
It's the sequel to the latest Jurassic. On the whole, very good. However, I don't have a few connections to the last film. And there does not seem to be an end. I'm curious to see if there is another part.
Beautiful fiction movie. Nothing really new in this part, but I just like the story because it's an interesting thought to bring these ursaurs to life. It is very conceivable that our own creations can be dangerous.
It's been years since the first Jurrassic Park movies were released, but in the sequel Jurassic World the film studios have done a lot of work. Tension to the end.
The story goes on and you can be curious. Very good implementation and acting performance here. Effects and CGI very well succeeded, so that you can look forward to the vllt other parts.
Thank you for doing so quickly and I am very satisfied.
I watched Jurassic World with the family and wasn't disappointed. Solid entertainment, suitable for a rainy evening. Of course, children have noticed the logical gaps in the end, but that's fine. There are no living dinos.
If you like dinosaurs and suspense, you're well advised with the film.
Very strong film. The best of Jurassic! Very exciting and above all almost like real. I'm curious if there will be a better one.
The film is full of action and a good story. Of course, there are a few scenes where it becomes implausible, but there were also the first trilogy. Total recommendation.
Very well staged sequel to the series, super computer animations of the dinosaurs.
The book is well written, there is no moment of boredom. I found the short novel very interesting and can only highly recommend it.
Here the life of extraordinary personalities is described humorously. The description of the actual benefits, e.g. of Gauss, could have been a little more detailed.
This book invites you to want to learn more and more and so you will probably catch yourself with how you sink into the Internet from time to time and search for and find information. Absolutely well written and highly recommended.
The book has been on the bestseller lists for years, so I thought I had to read it. Was very interesting and instructive.
To read this book you need leisure and concentration. It is linguistically and content-demanding. Awakens curiosity about the filming.
The book is very interesting and the writing style is slightly different, e.g. the literal speech is never used, otherwise I like it.
The film series, which builds up conclusively with backgrounds, is very well done, took me with me. I always like to watch wonder-woman Superman Batman, you can see these movies individually, but at the end of the day it's a movie series. Well done and implemented by the director and the actors.
The film is interesting because the subject of Superman is interpreted a little differently. The fight scenes could be a little shorter. That is always the same.
It is clear from the beginning where the path of history leads, and yet one likes to follow every fork in the road. At the very end, one is surprised that another door opens, which one does not really expect, ... but perhaps has guessed.
The book is extremely exciting, fast-paced and thrilling, so I could hardly put it away. For the confusing game at the end, however, there is one point deducted. Otherwise I had a few hours of real reading pleasure.
The book is recommended to anyone who likes it exciting. It is quickly read, the story takes a sudden turn. Also suitable for non-Fitzek fans or those who haven't read anything about him yet.
We know the author and find these books exciting. If you like psychological thrillers, you will find it here.
The story is told in an exciting way. Sometimes stay in the car longer because history captivates me so much.
Dan Brown is considered a master of conspiracy and is known for his detailed descriptions. He's done that again with Origin. One dives into history with interest and so it remains until the surprising end. There is no premonition about the course of action. The only shortcoming is that I still found the author's previous novels more captivating. Nevertheless, I am already looking forward to the next book by Dan Brown.
A readable because exciting and entertainingly told sequel to the Langdon series. Even if some developments can be guessed at quite early. Nevertheless, my conclusion remains: I liked it!
Dan Brown's fifth thriller with Robert Langdon is very exciting again. You can well imagine Tom Hanks in this role! I think the subject is very well presented. In some places the book digresses, therefore 4 stars.
Dan Brown has managed to convey high voltage. A book in which one can sink; a book that you don't get out of your hand so quickly.
Very exciting, unfortunately in some places somewhat implausible, but overall an appealing book. The author keeps his promise.
